The Project Gutenberg eBook of The Meaning of Relativity

   This ebook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
   most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
   restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
   under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
   ebook or online at [1]www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
   United States, you’ll have to check the laws of the country where you
   are located before using this eBook.

   Title: The Meaning of Relativity

   Author: Albert Einstein

   Translator: Edwin P. Adams

   Release date: May 29, 2011 [eBook #36276]
   Most recently updated: March 2, 2023

   Language: English

   Credits: Andrew D. Hwang, updated for HTML+SVG by Laura Natal Rodrigues

   *** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE MEANING OF RELATIVITY ***

   500

THE MEANING OF
RELATIVITY

   FOUR LECTURES DELIVERED AT PRINCETON UNIVERSITY, MAY, 1921

   BY
   ALBERT EINSTEIN

   WITH FOUR DIAGRAMS

   PRINCETON
   PRINCETON UNIVERSITY PRESS
   1923

   Copyright 1922 Princeton University Press Published 1922

   NOTE.—The translation of these lectures into English was made by EDWIN
   PLIMPTON ADAMS, Professor of Physics in Princeton University

CONTENTS

   LECTURE I
   [2]SPACE AND TIME IN PRE-RELATIVITY PHYSICS
   LECTURE II
   [3]THE THEORY OF SPECIAL RELATIVITY
   LECTURE III
   [4]THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY
   LECTURE IV
   [5]THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY (continued)
   [6]INDEX

THE MEANING OF RELATIVITY

LECTURE I
SPACE AND TIME IN PRE-RELATIVITY PHYSICS

   THE theory of relativity is intimately connected with the theory of
   space and time. I shall therefore begin with a brief investigation of
   the origin of our ideas of space and time, although in doing so I know
   that I introduce a controversial subject. The object of all science,
   whether natural science or psychology, is to co-ordinate our
   experiences and to bring them into a logical system. How are our
   customary ideas of space and time related to the character of our
   experiences?

   The experiences of an individual appear to us arranged in a series of
   events; in this series the single events which we remember appear to be
   ordered according to the criterion of "earlier" and "later," which
   cannot be analysed further. There exists, therefore, for the
   individual, an I-time, or subjective time. This in itself is not
   measurable. I can, indeed, associate numbers with the events, in such a
   way that a greater number is associated with the later event than with
   an earlier one; but the nature of this association may be quite
   arbitrary. This association I can define by means of a clock by
   comparing the order of events furnished by the clock with the order of
   the given series of events. We understand by a clock something which
   provides a series of events which can be counted, and which has other
   properties of which we shall speak later. [Pg 1]

   By the aid of speech different individuals can, to a certain extent,
   compare their experiences. In this way it is shown that certain sense
   perceptions of different individuals correspond to each other, while
   for other sense perceptions no such correspondence can be established.
   We are accustomed to regard as real those sense perceptions which are
   common to different individuals, and which therefore are, in a measure,
   impersonal. The natural sciences, and in particular, the most
   fundamental of them, physics, deal with such sense perceptions. The
   conception of physical bodies, in particular of rigid bodies, is a
   relatively constant complex of such sense perceptions. A clock is also
   a body, or a system, in the same sense, with the additional property
   that the series of events which it counts is formed of elements all of
   which can be regarded as equal.

   The only justification for our concepts and system of concepts is that
   they serve to represent the complex of our experiences; beyond this
   they have no legitimacy. I am convinced that the philosophers have had
   a harmful effect upon the progress of scientific thinking in removing
   certain fundamental concepts from the domain of empiricism, where they
   are under our control, to the intangible heights of the a priori. For
   even if it should appear that the universe of ideas cannot be deduced
   from experience by logical means, but is, in a sense, a creation of the
   human mind, without which no science is possible, nevertheless this
   universe of ideas is just as little independent of the nature of our
   experiences as clothes are of the form of the human body. This is
   particularly true of our concepts of time and space, which physicists
   have been obliged by the facts to bring down from the Olympus of the a
   priori in order to adjust them and put them in a serviceable condition.
   [Pg 2]

   We now come to our concepts and judgments of space. It is essential
   here also to pay strict attention to the relation of experience to our
   concepts. It seems to me that Poincaré clearly recognized the truth in
   the account he gave in his book, "La Science et l'Hypothèse." Among all
   the changes which we can perceive in a rigid body those are marked by
   their simplicity which can be made reversibly by an arbitrary motion of
   the body; Poincaré calls these, changes in position. By means of simple
   changes in position we can bring two bodies into contact. The theorems
   of congruence, fundamental in geometry, have to do with the laws that
   govern such changes in position. For the concept of space the following
   seems essential. We can form new bodies by bringing bodies , , ... up
   to body ; we say that we continue body . We can continue body in such a
   way that it comes into contact with any other body, . The ensemble of
   all continuations of body we can designate as the "space of the body ."
   Then it is true that all bodies are in the "space of the (arbitrarily
   chosen) body ." In this sense we cannot speak of space in the abstract,
   but only of the "space belonging to a body ." The earth's crust plays
   such a dominant rôle in our daily life in judging the relative
   positions of bodies that it has led to an abstract conception of space
   which certainly cannot be defended. In order to free ourselves from
   this fatal error we shall speak only of "bodies of reference," or
   "space of reference." It was only through the theory of general
   relativity that refinement of these concepts became necessary, as we
   shall see later.

   I shall not go into detail concerning those properties of the space of
   reference which lead to our conceiving points as elements of space, and
   space as a continuum. Nor shall I attempt to analyse further the
   properties of space which justify the conception [Pg 3] of continuous
   series of points, or lines. If these concepts are assumed, together
   with their relation to the solid bodies of experience, then it is easy
   to say what we mean by the three-dimensionality of space; to each point
   three numbers, , , (co-ordinates), may be associated, in such a way
   that this association is uniquely reciprocal, and that , and vary
   continuously when the point describes a continuous series of points (a
   line).

   It is assumed in pre-relativity physics that the laws of the
   orientation of ideal rigid bodies are consistent with Euclidean
   geometry. What this means may be expressed as follows: Two points
   marked on a rigid body form an interval. Such an interval can be
   oriented at rest, relatively to our space of reference, in a
   multiplicity of ways. If, now, the points of this space can be referred
   to co-ordinates , , , in such a way that the differences of the
   co-ordinates, , , , of the two ends of the interval furnish the same
   sum of squares, for every orientation of the interval, then the space
   of reference is called Euclidean, and the co-ordinates Cartesian.[7][1]
   It is sufficient, indeed, to make this assumption in the limit for an
   infinitely small interval. Involved in this assumption there are some
   which are rather less special, to which we must call attention on
   account of their fundamental significance. In the first place, it is
   assumed that one can move an ideal rigid body in an arbitrary manner.
   In the second place, it is assumed that the behaviour of ideal rigid
   bodies towards orientation is independent [Pg 4] of the material of the
   bodies and their changes of position, in the sense that if two
   intervals can once be brought into coincidence, they can always and
   everywhere be brought into coincidence. Both of these assumptions,
   which are of fundamental importance for geometry and especially for
   physical measurements, naturally arise from experience; in the theory
   of general relativity their validity needs to be assumed only for
   bodies and spaces of reference which are infinitely small compared to
   astronomical dimensions.

   [8][1]This relation must hold for an arbitrary choice of the origin and
   of the direction (ratios ) of the interval.

   The quantity we call the length of the interval. In order that this may
   be uniquely determined it is necessary to fix arbitrarily the length of
   a definite interval; for example, we can put it equal to 1 (unit of
   length). Then the lengths of all other intervals may be determined. If
   we make the linearly dependent upon a parameter , we obtain a fine
   which has all the properties of the straight lines of the Euclidean
   geometry. In particular, it easily follows that by laying off times the
   interval upon a straight fine, an interval of length is obtained. A
   length, therefore, means the result of a measurement carried out along
   a straight line by means of a unit measuring rod. It has a significance
   which is as independent of the system of co-ordinates as that of a
   straight line, as will appear in the sequel.

   We come now to a train of thought which plays an analogous role in the
   theories of special and general relativity. We ask the question:
   besides the Cartesian co-ordinates which we have used are there other
   equivalent co-ordinates? An interval has [Pg 5] a physical meaning
   which is independent of the choice of co-ordinates; and so has the
   spherical surface which we obtain as the locus of the end points of all
   equal intervals that we lay off from an arbitrary point of our space of
   reference. If as well as ( from 1 to 3) are Cartesian co-ordinates of
   our space of reference, then the spherical surface will be expressed in
   our two systems of co-ordinates by the equations How must the be
   expressed in terms of the in order that equations (2) and (2a) may be
   equivalent to each other? Regarding the expressed as functions of the ,
   we can write, by Taylor's theorem, for small values of the , If we
   substitute (2a) in this equation and compare with (1), we see that the
   must be linear functions of the . If we therefore put [Pg 6] then the
   equivalence of equations (2) and (2a) is expressed in the form It
   therefore follows that must be a constant. If we put = 1, (2b) and (3a)
   furnish the conditions in which = 1, or = 0, according = or ≠ . The
   conditions (4) are called the conditions of orthogonality, and the
   transformations (3), (4), linear orthogonal transformations. If we
   stipulate that shall be equal to the square of the length in every
   system of co-ordinates, and if we always measure with the same unit
   scale, then must be equal to 1. Therefore the linear orthogonal
   transformations are the only ones by means of which we can pass from
   one Cartesian system of co-ordinates in our space of reference to
   another. We see that in applying such transformations the equations of
   a straight line become equations of a straight line. Reversing
   equations (3a) by multiplying both sides by and summing for all the 's,
   we obtain The same coefficients, , also determine the inverse
   substitution of . Geometrically, is the cosine of the angle between the
   axis and the axis. [Pg 7]

   To sum up, we can say that in the Euclidean geometry there are (in a
   given space of reference) preferred systems of co-ordinates, the
   Cartesian systems, which transform into each other by linear orthogonal
   transformations. The distance between two points of our space of
   reference, measured by a measuring rod, is expressed in such
   co-ordinates in a particularly simple manner. The whole of geometry may
   be founded upon this conception of distance. In the present treatment,
   geometry is related to actual things (rigid bodies), and its theorems
   are statements concerning the behaviour of these things, which may
   prove to be true or false.

   One is ordinarily accustomed to study geometry divorced from any
   relation between its concepts and experience. There are advantages in
   isolating that which is purely logical and independent of what is, in
   principle, incomplete empiricism. This is satisfactory to the pure
   mathematician. He is satisfied if he can deduce his theorems from
   axioms correctly, that is, without errors of logic. The question as to
   whether Euclidean geometry is true or not does not concern him. But for
   our purpose it is necessary to associate the fundamental concepts of
   geometry with natural objects; without such an association geometry is
   worthless for the physicist. The physicist is concerned with the
   question as to whether the theorems of geometry are true or not. That
   Euclidean geometry, from this point of view, affirms something more
   than the mere deductions derived logically from definitions may be seen
   from the following simple consideration.

   Between points of space there are distances, ; between these and the
   co-ordinates we have the relations [Pg 8]

   From these equations the co-ordinates may be eliminated, and from this
   elimination at least equations in the , will result.[9][2] Since the
   are measurable quantities, and by definition are independent of each
   other, these relations between the are not necessary a priori.

   [10][2]In reality there are equations.

   From the foregoing it is evident that the equations of transformation
   (3), (4) have a fundamental significance in Euclidean geometry, in that
   they govern the transformation from one Cartesian system of
   co-ordinates to another. The Cartesian systems of co-ordinates are
   characterized by the property that in them the measurable distance
   between two points, , is expressed by the equation

   If and are two Cartesian systems of co-ordinates, then

   The right-hand side is identically equal to the left-hand side on
   account of the equations of the linear orthogonal transformation, and
   the right-hand side differs from the left-hand side only in that the
   are replaced by the . This is expressed by the statement that is an
   invariant with respect to linear orthogonal transformations. It is
   evident that in the Euclidean geometry only such, and all such,
   quantities have an objective significance, independent of the
   particular choice of [Pg 9] the Cartesian co-ordinates, as can be
   expressed by an invariant with respect to linear orthogonal
   transformations. This is the reason that the theory of invariants,
   which has to do with the laws that govern the form of invariants, is so
   important for analytical geometry.

   As a second example of a geometrical invariant, consider a volume. This
   is expressed by By means of Jacobi's theorem we may write where the
   integrand in the last integral is the functional determinant of the
   with respect to the , and this by (3) is equal to the determinant of
   the coefficients of substitution, . If we form the determinant of the
   from equation (4), we obtain, by means of the theorem of multiplication
   of determinants, If we limit ourselves to those transformations which
   have the determinant +1,[11][3] and only these arise from continuous
   variations of the systems of co-ordinates, then is an invariant.

   [12][3]There are thus two kinds of Cartesian systems which are
   designated as "right-handed" and "left-handed" systems. The difference
   between these is familiar to every physicist and engineer. It is
   interesting to note that these two kinds of systems cannot be defined
   geometrically, but only the contrast between them.

   [Pg 10]

   Invariants, however, are not the only forms by means of which we can
   give expression to the independence of the particular choice of the
   Cartesian co-ordinates. Vectors and tensors are other forms of
   expression. Let us express the fact that the point with the current
   co-ordinates lies upon a straight line. We have Without limiting the
   generality we can put

   If we multiply the equations by (compare (3a) and (5)) and sum for all
   the 's, we get where we have written

   These are the equations of straight lines with respect to a second
   Cartesian system of co-ordinates '. They have the same form as the
   equations with respect to the original system of co-ordinates. It is
   therefore evident that straight lines have a significance which is
   independent of the system of co-ordinates. Formally, this depends upon
   the fact that the quantities ( ) - are transformed as the components of
   an interval, . The ensemble of three quantities, defined for every
   system of Cartesian co-ordinates, and which transform as the components
   of an interval, is called a vector. If the three [Pg 11] components of
   a vector vanish for one system of Cartesian co-ordinates, they vanish
   for all systems, because the equations of transformation are
   homogeneous. We can thus get the meaning of the concept of a vector
   without referring to a geometrical representation. This behaviour of
   the equations of a straight line can be expressed by saying that the
   equation of a straight line is co-variant with respect to linear
   orthogonal transformations.

   We shall now show briefly that there are geometrical entities which
   lead to the concept of tensors. Let be the centre of a surface of the
   second degree, any point on the surface, and the projections of the
   interval upon the co-ordinate axes. Then the equation of the surface is
   In this, and in analogous cases, we shall omit the sign of summation,
   and understand that the summation is to be carried out for those
   indices that appear twice. We thus write the equation of the surface
   The quantities determine the surface completely, for a given position
   of the centre, with respect to the chosen system of Cartesian
   co-ordinates. From the known law of transformation for the (3a) for
   linear orthogonal transformations, we easily find the law of
   transformation for the :[13][4]

   [14][4]The equation may, by (5), be replaced by = 1, from which the
   result stated immediately follows.

   [Pg 12]

   This transformation is homogeneous and of the first degree in the . On
   account of this transformation, the , are called components of a tensor
   of the second rank (the latter on account of the double index). If all
   the components, , of a tensor with respect to any system of Cartesian
   co-ordinates vanish, they vanish with respect to every other Cartesian
   system. The form and the position of the surface of the second degree
   is described by this tensor ( ).

   Analytic tensors of higher rank (number of indices) may be defined. It
   is possible and advantageous to regard vectors as tensors of rank 1,
   and invariants (scalars) as tensors of rank 0. In this respect, the
   problem of the theory of invariants may be so formulated: according to
   what laws may new tensors be formed from given tensors? We shall
   consider these laws now, in order to be able to apply them later. We
   shall deal first only with the properties of tensors with respect to
   the transformation from one Cartesian system to another in the same
   space of reference, by means of linear orthogonal transformations. As
   the laws are wholly independent of the number of dimensions, we shall
   leave this number, , indefinite at first.

   Definition. If a figure is defined with respect to every system of
   Cartesian co-ordinates in a space of reference of dimensions by the
   numbers ( = number of indices), then these numbers are the components
   of a tensor of rank if the transformation law is [Pg 13]

   Remark. From this definition it follows that is an invariant, provided
   that ( ), ( ), ( ) ... are vectors. Conversely, the tensor character of
   ( ) may be inferred, if it is known that the expression (8) leads to an
   invariant for an arbitrary choice of the vectors ( ), ( ), etc.

   Addition and Subtraction. By addition and subtraction of the
   corresponding components of tensors of the same rank, a tensor of equal
   rank results: The proof follows from the definition of a tensor given
   above.

   Multiplication. From a tensor of rank and a tensor of rank we may
   obtain a tensor of rank + by multiplying all the components of the
   first tensor by all the components of the second tensor:

   Contraction. A tensor of rank - 2 may be obtained from one of rank by
   putting two definite indices equal to each other and then summing for
   this single index:

   [Pg 14]

   The proof is

   In addition to these elementary rules of operation there is also the
   formation of tensors by differentiation ("erweiterung"):

   New tensors, in respect to linear orthogonal transformations, may be
   formed from tensors according to these rules of operation.

   Symmetrical Properties of Tensors. Tensors are called symmetrical or
   skew-symmetrical in respect to two of their indices, and , if both the
   components which result from interchanging the indices and are equal to
   each other or equal with opposite signs.

   Theorem. The character of symmetry or skew-symmetry exists
   independently of the choice of co-ordinates, and in this lies its
   importance. The proof follows from the equation defining tensors.

   Special Tensors.

   I. The quantities (4) are tensor components (fundamental tensor). [Pg
   15]

   Proof. If in the right-hand side of the equation of transformation = ,
   we substitute for the quantities (which are equal to 1 or 0 according
   as = or ≠ ), we get The justification for the last sign of equality
   becomes evident if one applies (4) to the inverse substitution (5).

   II. There is a tensor ( ) skew-symmetrical with respect to all pairs of
   indices, whose rank is equal to the number of dimensions, , and whose
   components are equal to +1 or -1 according as is an even or odd
   permutation of 1 2 3....

   The proof follows with the aid of the theorem proved above

   These few simple theorems form the apparatus from the theory of
   invariants for building the equations of pre-relativity physics and the
   theory of special relativity.

   We have seen that in pre-relativity physics, in order to specify
   relations in space, a body of reference, or a space of reference, is
   required, and, in addition, a Cartesian system of co-ordinates. We can
   fuse both these concepts into a single one by thinking of a Cartesian
   system of co-ordinates as a cubical frame-work formed of rods each of
   unit length. The co-ordinates of the lattice points of this frame are
   integral numbers. It follows from the fundamental relation that the
   members of such a space-lattice are all of unit length. To specify
   relations in time, we require in addition a standard clock placed at
   the origin of our Cartesian system of co-ordinates [Pg 16] or frame of
   reference. If an event takes place anywhere we can assign to it three
   co-ordinates, , and a time , as soon as we have specified the time of
   the clock at the origin which is simultaneous with the event. We
   therefore give an objective significance to the statement of the
   simultaneity of distant events, while previously we have been concerned
   only with the simultaneity of two experiences of an individual. The
   time so specified is at all events independent of the position of the
   system of co-ordinates in our space of reference, and is therefore an
   invariant with respect to the transformation (3).

   It is postulated that the system of equations expressing the laws of
   pre-relativity physics is co-variant with respect to the transformation
   (3), as are the relations of Euclidean geometry. The isotropy and
   homogeneity of space is expressed in this way.[15][5] We shall now
   consider some of the more important equations of physics from this
   point of view.

   [16][5]The laws of physics could be expressed, even in case there were
   a unique direction in space, in such a way as to be co-variant with
   respect to the transformation (3); but such an expression would in this
   case be unsuitable. If there were a unique direction in space it would
   simplify the description of natural phenomena to orient the system of
   co-ordinates in a definite way in this direction. But if, on the other
   hand, there is no unique direction in space it is not logical to
   formulate the laws of nature in such a way as to conceal the
   equivalence of systems of co-ordinates that are oriented differently.
   We shall meet with this point of view again in the theories of special
   and general relativity.

   The equations of motion of a material particle are ( ) is a vector; ,
   and therefore also , an invariant; thus [Pg 17] ( ) is a vector; in the
   same way it may be shown that ( ) is a vector. In general, the
   operation of differentiation with respect to time does not alter the
   tensor character. Since is an invariant (tensor of rank 0), ) is a
   vector, or tensor of rank 1 (by the theorem of the multiplication of
   tensors). If the force ( ) has a vector character, the same holds for
   the difference ( . These equations of motion are therefore valid in
   every other system of Cartesian co-ordinates in the space of reference.
   In the case where the forces are conservative we can easily recognize
   the vector character of ( ). For a potential energy, , exists, which
   depends only upon the mutual distances of the particles, and is
   therefore an invariant. The vector character of the force, = , is then
   a consequence of our general theorem about the derivative of a tensor
   of rank 0.

   Multiplying by the velocity, a tensor of rank 1, we obtain the tensor
   equation By contraction and multiplication by the scalar we obtain the
   equation of kinetic energy [Pg 18]

   If denotes the difference of the co-ordinates of the material particle
   and a point fixed in space, then the have the character of vectors. We
   evidently have = , so that the equations of motion of the particle may
   be written

   Multiplying this equation by we obtain a tensor equation

   Contracting the tensor on the left and taking the time average we
   obtain the virial theorem, which we shall not consider further. By
   interchanging the indices and subsequent subtraction, we obtain, after
   a simple transformation, the theorem of moments,

   It is evident in this way that the moment of a vector is not a vector
   but a tensor. On account of their skew-symmetrical character there are
   not nine, but only three independent equations of this system. The
   possibility of replacing skew-symmetrical tensors of the second rank in
   space of three dimensions by vectors depends upon the formation of the
   vector [Pg 19]

   If we multiply the skew-symmetrical tensor of rank 2 by the special
   skew-symmetrical tensor introduced above, and contract twice, a vector
   results whose components are numerically equal to those of the tensor.
   These are the so-called axial vectors which transform differently, from
   a right-handed system to a left-handed system, from the . There is a
   gain in picturesqueness in regarding a skew-symmetrical tensor of rank
   2 as a vector in space of three dimensions, but it does not represent
   the exact nature of the corresponding quantity so well as considering
   it a tensor.

   We consider next the equations of motion of a continuous medium. Let be
   the density, the velocity components considered as functions of the
   co-ordinates and the time, the volume forces per unit of mass, and the
   stresses upon a surface perpendicular to the a-axis in the direction of
   increasing . Then the equations of motion are, by Newton's law, in
   which is the acceleration of the particle which at time has the
   co-ordinates . If we express this acceleration by partial differential
   coefficients, we obtain, after dividing by ,

   We must show that this equation holds independently of the special
   choice of the Cartesian system of co-ordinates. ( ) is a vector, and
   therefore is also a vector. [Pg 20] is a tensor of rank 2, is a tensor
   of rank 3. The second term on the left results from contraction in the
   indices , . The vector character of the second term on the right is
   obvious. In order that the first term on the right may also be a vector
   it is necessary for to be a tensor. Then by differentiation and
   contraction results, and is therefore a vector, as it also is after
   multiplication by the reciprocal scalar . That is a tensor, and
   therefore transforms according to the equation is proved in mechanics
   by integrating this equation over an infinitely small tetrahedron. It
   is also proved there, by application of the theorem of moments to an
   infinitely small parallelopipedon, that , and hence that the tensor of
   the stress is a symmetrical tensor. From what has been said it follows
   that, with the aid of the rules given above, the equation is co-variant
   with respect to orthogonal transformations in space (rotational
   transformations); and the rules according to which the quantities in
   the equation must be transformed in order that the equation may be
   co-variant also become evident.

   The co-variance of the equation of continuity, requires, from the
   foregoing, no particular discussion.

   We shall also test for co-variance the equations which express the
   dependence of the stress components upon the properties of [Pg 21] the
   matter, and set up these equations for the case of a compressible
   viscous fluid with the aid of the conditions of co-variance. If we
   neglect the viscosity, the pressure, , will be a scalar, and will
   depend only upon the density and the temperature of the fluid. The
   contribution to the stress tensor is then evidently in which is the
   special symmetrical tensor. This term will also be present in the case
   of a viscous fluid. But in this case there will also be pressure terms,
   which depend upon the space derivatives of the . We shall assume that
   this dependence is a linear one. Since these terms must be symmetrical
   tensors, the only ones which enter will be (for is a scalar). For
   physical reasons (no slipping) it is assumed that for symmetrical
   dilatations in all directions, i.e. when there are no frictional forces
   present, from which it follows that = . If only is different from zero,
   let , by which is determined. We then obtain for the complete stress
   tensor, [Pg 22]

   The heuristic value of the theory of invariants, which arises from the
   isotropy of space (equivalence of all directions), becomes evident from
   this example.

   We consider, finally, Maxwell's equations in the form which are the
   foundation of the electron theory of Lorentz.

   is a vector, because the current density is defined as the density of
   electricity multiplied by the vector velocity of the electricity.
   According to the first three equations it is evident that is also to be
   regarded as a vector. Then cannot be regarded as a vector.[17][6] The
   equations may, however, easily be [Pg 23] interpreted if is regarded as
   a skew-symmetrical tensor of the second rank. In this sense, we write ,
   , in place of , , respectively. Paying attention to the skew-symmetry
   of , the first three equations of (19) and (20) may be written in the
   form In contrast to , appears as a quantity which has the same type of
   symmetry as an angular velocity. The divergence equations then take the
   form The last equation is a skew-symmetrical tensor equation of the
   third rank (the skew-symmetry of the left-hand side with respect to
   every pair of indices may easily be proved, if attention is paid to the
   skew-symmetry of ). This notation is more natural than the usual one,
   because, in contrast to the latter, it is applicable to Cartesian
   left-handed systems as well as to right-handed systems without change
   of sign. [Pg 24]

   [18][6]These considerations will make the reader familiar with tensor
   operations without the special difficulties of the four-dimensional
   treatment; corresponding considerations in the theory of special
   relativity (Minkowski's interpretation of the field) will then offer
   fewer difficulties.

LECTURE II
THE THEORY OF SPECIAL RELATIVITY

   THE previous considerations concerning the configuration of rigid
   bodies have been founded, irrespective of the assumption as to the
   validity of the Euclidean geometry, upon the hypothesis that all
   directions in space, or all configurations of Cartesian systems of
   co-ordinates, are physically equivalent. We may express this as the
   "principle of relativity with respect to direction," and it has been
   shown how equations (laws of nature) may be found, in accord with this
   principle, by the aid of the calculus of tensors. We now inquire
   whether there is a relativity with respect to the state of motion of
   the space of reference; in other words, whether there are spaces of
   reference in motion relatively to each other which are physically
   equivalent. From the standpoint of mechanics it appears that equivalent
   spaces of reference do exist. For experiments upon the earth tell us
   nothing of the fact that we are moving about the sun with a velocity of
   approximately 30 kilometres a second. On the other hand, this physical
   equivalence does not seem to hold for spaces of reference in arbitrary
   motion; for mechanical effects do not seem to be subject to the same
   laws in a jolting railway train as in one moving with uniform velocity;
   the rotation of the earth must be considered in writing down the
   equations of motion relatively to the earth. It appears, therefore, as
   if there were Cartesian systems of co-ordinates, the so-called inertial
   systems, with reference to which the laws of mechanics (more generally
   the laws of physics) are expressed in the simplest form. We may infer
   the validity of the following theorem: If is an inertial system, then
   every [Pg 25] other system ' which moves uniformly and without rotation
   relatively to , is also an inertial system; the laws of nature are in
   concordance for all inertial systems. This statement we shall call the
   "principle of special relativity." We shall draw certain conclusions
   from this principle of "relativity of translation" just as we have
   already done for relativity of direction.

   In order to be able to do this, we must first solve the following
   problem. If we are given the Cartesian co-ordinates, , and the time, ,
   of an event relatively to one inertial system, , how can we calculate
   the co-ordinates, , and the time, ', of the same event relatively to an
   inertial system ' which moves with uniform translation relatively to ?
   In the pre-relativity physics this problem was solved by making
   unconsciously two hypotheses:—

   1. The time is absolute; the time of an event, ', relatively to ' is
   the same as the time relatively to . If instantaneous signals could be
   sent to a distance, and if one knew that the state of motion of a clock
   had no influence on its rate, then this assumption would be physically
   established. For then clocks, similar to one another, and regulated
   alike, could be distributed over the systems and ', at rest relatively
   to them, and their indications would be independent of the state of
   motion of the systems; the time of an event would then be given by the
   clock in its immediate neighbourhood.

   2. Length is absolute; if an interval, at rest relatively to , has a
   length , then it has the same length relatively to a system ' which is
   in motion relatively to .

   If the axes of and ' are parallel to each other, a simple calculation
   based on these two assumptions, gives the equations [Pg 26] of
   transformation

   This transformation is known as the "Galilean Transformation."
   Differentiating twice by the time, we get Further, it follows that for
   two simultaneous events, The invariance of the distance between the two
   points results from squaring and adding. From this easily follows the
   co-variance of Newton's equations of motion with respect to the
   Galilean transformation (21). Hence it follows that classical mechanics
   is in accord with the principle of special relativity if the two
   hypotheses respecting scales and clocks are made.

   But this attempt to found relativity of translation upon the Galilean
   transformation fails when applied to electromagnetic phenomena. The
   Maxwell-Lorentz electromagnetic equations are not co-variant with
   respect to the Galilean transformation. In particular, we note, by
   (21), that a ray of light which referred to has a velocity , has a
   different velocity referred to ', depending upon its direction. The
   space of reference of is therefore distinguished, with respect to its
   physical properties, from all spaces of reference which are in motion
   relatively to it (quiescent æther). But all experiments have shown that
   electromagnetic and optical phenomena, relatively to the earth as the
   [Pg 27] body of reference, are not influenced by the translational
   velocity of the earth. The most important of these experiments are
   those of Michelson and Morley, which I shall assume are known. The
   validity of the principle of special relativity can therefore hardly be
   doubted.

   On the other hand, the Maxwell-Lorentz equations have proved their
   validity in the treatment of optical problems in moving bodies. No
   other theory has satisfactorily explained the facts of aberration, the
   propagation of light in moving bodies (Fizeau), and phenomena observed
   in double stars (De Sitter). The consequence of the Maxwell-Lorentz
   equations that in a vacuum light is propagated with the velocity , at
   least with respect to a definite inertial system , must therefore be
   regarded as proved. According to the principle of special relativity,
   we must also assume the truth of this principle for every other
   inertial system.

   Before we draw any conclusions from these two principles we must first
   review the physical significance of the concepts "time" and "velocity."
   It follows from what has gone before, that co-ordinates with respect to
   an inertial system are physically defined by means of measurements and
   constructions with the aid of rigid bodies. In order to measure time,
   we have supposed a clock, , present somewhere, at rest relatively to .
   But we cannot fix the time, by means of this clock, of an event whose
   distance from the clock is not negligible; for there are no
   "instantaneous signals" that we can use in order to compare the time of
   the event with that of the clock. In order to complete the definition
   of time we may employ the principle of the constancy of the velocity of
   fight in a vacuum. Let us suppose that we place similar clocks at
   points of the system , at rest relatively [Pg 28] to it, and regulated
   according to the following scheme. A ray of light is sent out from one
   of the clocks, , at the instant when it indicates the time , and
   travels through a vacuum a distance , to the clock ; at the instant
   when this ray meets the clock the latter is set to indicate the time =
   + .[19][7] The principle of the constancy of the velocity of light then
   states that this adjustment of the clocks will not lead to
   contradictions. With clocks so adjusted, we can assign the time to
   events which take place near any one of them. It is essential to note
   that this definition of time relates only to the inertial system ,
   since we have used a system of clocks at rest relatively to . The
   assumption which was made in the pre-relativity physics of the absolute
   character of time (i.e. the independence of time of the choice of the
   inertial system) does not follow at all from this definition.

   [20][7]Strictly speaking, it would be more correct to define
   simultaneity first, somewhat as follows: two events taking place at the
   points and of the system are simultaneous if they appear at the same
   instant when observed from the middle point, , of the interval . Time
   is then defined as the ensemble of the indications of similar clocks,
   at rest relatively to , which register the same simultaneously.

   The theory of relativity is often criticized for giving, without
   justification, a central theoretical role to the propagation of light,
   in that it founds the concept of time upon the law of propagation of
   light. The situation, however, is somewhat as follows. In order to give
   physical significance to the concept of time, processes of some kind
   are required which enable relations to be established between different
   places. It is immaterial what kind of processes one chooses for such a
   definition of time. It is advantageous, however, for the theory, to
   choose only those [Pg 29] processes concerning which we know something
   certain. This holds for the propagation of light in vacuo in a higher
   degree than for any other process which could be considered, thanks to
   the investigations of Maxwell and H. A. Lorentz.

   From all of these considerations, space and time data have a physically
   real, and not a mere fictitious, significance; in particular this holds
   for all the relations in which co-ordinates and time enter, e.g. the
   relations (21). There is, therefore, sense in asking whether those
   equations are true or not, as well as in asking what the true equations
   of transformation are by which we pass from one inertial system to
   another, ', moving relatively to it. It may be shown that this is
   uniquely settled by means of the principle of the constancy of the
   velocity of light and the principle of special relativity.

   To this end we think of space and time physically defined with respect
   to two inertial systems, and ', in the way that has been shown.
   Further, let a ray of light pass from one point to another point of
   through a vacuum. If is the measured distance between the two points,
   then the propagation of light must satisfy the equation

   If we square this equation, and express by the differences of the
   co-ordinates, , in place of this equation we can write This equation
   formulates the principle of the constancy of the velocity of light
   relatively to . It must hold whatever may be the motion of the source
   which emits the ray of light. [Pg 30]

   The same propagation of light may also be considered relatively to ',
   in which case also the principle of the constancy of the velocity of
   light must be satisfied. Therefore, with respect to ', we have the
   equation

   Equations (22a) and (22) must be mutually consistent with each other
   with respect to the transformation which transforms from to '. A
   transformation which effects this we shall call a "Lorentz
   transformation."

   Before considering these transformations in detail we shall make a few
   general remarks about space and time. In the pre-relativity physics
   space and time were separate entities. Specifications of time were
   independent of the choice of the space of reference. The Newtonian
   mechanics was relative with respect to the space of reference, so that,
   e.g. the statement that two non-simultaneous events happened at the
   same place had no objective meaning (that is, independent of the space
   of reference). But this relativity had no role in building up the
   theory. One spoke of points of space, as of instants of time, as if
   they were absolute realities. It was not observed that the true element
   of the space-time specification was the event, specified by the four
   numbers , , , . The conception of something happening was always that
   of a four-dimensional continuum; but the recognition of this was
   obscured by the absolute character of the pre-relativity time. Upon
   giving up the hypothesis of the absolute character of time,
   particularly that of simultaneity, the four-dimensionality of the
   time-space concept was immediately recognized. It is neither the point
   in space, nor the instant in [Pg 31] time, at which something happens
   that has physical reality, but only the event itself. There is no
   absolute (independent of the space of reference) relation in space, and
   no absolute relation in time between two events, but there is an
   absolute (independent of the space of reference) relation in space and
   time, as will appear in the sequel. The circumstance that there is no
   objective rational division of the four-dimensional continuum into a
   three-dimensional space and a one-dimensional time continuum indicates
   that the laws of nature will assume a form which is logically most
   satisfactory when expressed as laws in the four-dimensional space-time
   continuum. Upon this depends the great advance in method which the
   theory of relativity owes to Minkowski. Considered from this
   standpoint, we must regard , , , as the four co-ordinates of an event
   in the four-dimensional continuum. We have far less success in
   picturing to ourselves relations in this four-dimensional continuum
   than in the three-dimensional Euclidean continuum; but it must be
   emphasized that even in the Euclidean three-dimensional geometry its
   concepts and relations are only of an abstract nature in our minds, and
   are not at all identical with the images we form visually and through
   our sense of touch. The non-divisibility of the four-dimensional
   continuum of events does not at all, however, involve the equivalence
   of the space co-ordinates with the time co-ordinate. On the contrary,
   we must remember that the time co-ordinate is defined physically wholly
   differently from the space co-ordinates. The relations (22) and (22a)
   which when equated define the Lorentz transformation show, further, a
   difference in the role of the time co-ordinate from that of the space
   co-ordinates; for the term has the opposite sign to the space terms, ,
   , . [Pg 32]

   Before we analyse further the conditions which define the Lorentz
   transformation, we shall introduce the light-time, , in place of the
   time, , in order that the constant shall not enter explicitly into the
   formulas to be developed later. Then the Lorentz transformation is
   defined in such a way that, first, it makes the equation a co-variant
   equation, that is, an equation which is satisfied with respect to every
   inertial system if it is satisfied in the inertial system to which we
   refer the two given events (emission and reception of the ray of
   light). Finally, with Minkowski, we introduce in place of the real time
   co-ordinate , the imaginary time co-ordinate Then the equation defining
   the propagation of light, which must be co-variant with respect to the
   Lorentz transformation, becomes This condition is always
   satisfied[21][8] if we satisfy the more general condition that [Pg 33]
   shall be an invariant with respect to the transformation. This
   condition is satisfied only by linear transformations, that is,
   transformations of the type in which the summation over the is to be
   extended from = 1 to = 4. A glance at equations (23) and (24) shows
   that the Lorentz transformation so defined is identical with the
   translational and rotational transformations of the Euclidean geometry,
   if we disregard the number of dimensions and the relations of reality.
   We can also conclude that the coefficients must satisfy the conditions
   Since the ratios of the are real, it follows that all the and the are
   real, except , , , , , and , which are purely imaginary.

   [22][8]That this specialization lies in the nature of the case will be
   evident later.

   Special Lorentz Transformation. We obtain the simplest transformations
   of the type of (24) and (25) if only two of the co-ordinates are to be
   transformed, and if all the , which determine the new origin, vanish.
   We obtain then for the indices 1 and 2, on account of the three
   independent conditions which the relations (25) furnish, [Pg 34]

   This is a simple rotation in space of the (space) co-ordinate system
   about -axis. We see that the rotational transformation in space
   (without the time transformation) which we studied before is contained
   in the Lorentz transformation as a special case. For the indices 1 and
   4 we obtain, in an analogous manner,

   On account of the relations of reality must be taken as imaginary. To
   interpret these equations physically, we introduce the real light-time
   and the velocity of ' relatively to , instead of the imaginary angle .
   We have, first, Since for the origin of ' i.e., for = 0, we must have ,
   it follows from the first of these equations that and also [Pg 35] so
   that we obtain

   These equations form the well-known special Lorentz transformation,
   which in the general theory represents a rotation, through an imaginary
   angle, of the four-dimensional system of co-ordinates. If we introduce
   the ordinary time , in place of the light-time , then in (29) we must
   replace by and by .

   We must now fill in a gap. From the principle of the constancy of the
   velocity of light it follows that the equation has a significance which
   is independent of the choice of the inertial system; but the invariance
   of the quantity does not at all follow from this. This quantity might
   be transformed with a factor. This depends upon the fact that the
   right-hand side of (29) might be multiplied by a factor , independent
   of . But the principle of relativity does not permit this factor to be
   different from 1, as we shall now show. Let us assume that we have a
   rigid circular cylinder moving in the direction of its axis. If its
   radius, measured at rest with a unit measuring rod is equal to , its
   radius in motion, might be different from , since the theory of
   relativity does not make the assumption that the shape of bodies with
   respect to a space of reference is independent of their motion
   relatively to this space of reference. But [Pg 36] all directions in
   space must be equivalent to each other. may therefore depend upon the
   magnitude of the velocity, but not upon its direction; must therefore
   be an even function of . If the cylinder is at rest relatively to ' the
   equation of its lateral surface is If we write the last two equations
   of (29) more generally then the lateral surface of the cylinder
   referred to satisfies the equation The factor therefore measures the
   lateral contraction of the cylinder, and can thus, from the above, be
   only an even function of .

   If we introduce a third system of co-ordinates, ", which moves
   relatively to ' with velocity in the direction of the negative -axis of
   , we obtain, by applying (29) twice, Now, since must be equal to and
   since we assume that we use the same measuring rods in all the systems,
   it follows that the transformation of " to must be the identical [Pg
   37] transformation (since the possibility does not need to be
   considered). It is essential for these considerations to assume that
   the behaviour of the measuring rods does not depend upon the history of
   their previous motion.

   Moving Measuring Rods and Clocks. At the definite -time, , the position
   of the points given by the integers , is with respect to , given by ;
   this follows from the first of equations (29) and expresses the Lorentz
   contraction. A clock at rest at the origin of , whose beats are
   characterized by , will, when observed from ', have beats characterized
   by this follows from the second of equations (29) and shows that the
   clock goes slower than if it were at rest relatively to '. These two
   consequences, which hold, mutatis mutandis, for every system of
   reference, form the physical content, free from convention, of the
   Lorentz transformation.

   Addition Theorem for Velocities. If we combine two special Lorentz
   transformations with the relative velocities and , then the velocity of
   the single Lorentz transformation which takes the place of the two
   separate ones is, according to (27), given by [Pg 38]

   General Statements about the Lorentz Transformation and its Theory of
   Invariants. The whole theory of invariants of the special theory of
   relativity depends upon the invariant (23). Formally, it has the same
   rôle in the four-dimensional space-time continuum as the invariant + +
   in the Euclidean geometry and in the pre-relativity physics. The latter
   quantity is not an invariant with respect to all the Lorentz
   transformations; the quantity of equation (23) assumes the rôle of this
   invariant. With respect to an arbitrary inertial system, may be
   determined by measurements; with a given unit of measure it is a
   completely determinate quantity, associated with an arbitrary pair of
   events.

   The invariant differs, disregarding the number of dimensions, from the
   corresponding invariant of the Euclidean geometry in the following
   points. In the Euclidean geometry is necessarily positive; it vanishes
   only when the two points concerned come together. On the other hand,
   from the vanishing of it cannot be concluded that the two space-time
   points fall together; the vanishing of this quantity , is the invariant
   condition that the two space-time points can be connected by a light
   signal in vacuo. If a point (event) represented in the four-dimensional
   space of the , , , then all the "points" which can be connected to by
   means of a light signal lie upon the cone = 0 (compare Fig. 1, in which
   the dimension is suppressed). The "upper" half of the cone may contain
   the "points" to which light signals can be sent from ; then the "lower"
   half [Pg 39] of the cone will contain the "points" from which light
   signals can be sent to . The points enclosed by the conical surface
   furnish, with , a negative ; as well as is then, according to
   Minkowski, of the nature of a time. Such intervals represent elements
   of possible paths of motion, the velocity being less than that of
   light.[23][9] In this case the -axis may be drawn [Pg 40] in the
   direction of by suitably choosing the state of motion of the inertial
   system. If lies outside of the "light-cone" then is of the nature of a
   space; in this case, by properly choosing the inertial system, can be
   made to vanish.
   300

   FIG. 1.

   [24][9]That material velocities exceeding that of light are not
   possible, fol- lows from the appearance of the radical in the special
   Lorentz transformation (29).

   By the introduction of the imaginary time variable, , Minkowski has
   made the theory of invariants for the four-dimensional continuum of
   physical phenomena fully analogous to the theory of invariants for the
   three-dimensional continuum of Euclidean space. The theory of
   four-dimensional tensors of special relativity differs from the theory
   of tensors in three-dimensional space, therefore, only in the number of
   dimensions and the relations of reality.

   A physical entity which is specified by four quantities, , in an
   arbitrary inertial system of the , , , , is called a 4-vector, with the
   components , if the correspond in their relations of reality and the
   properties of transformation to the ; it may be of the nature of a
   space or of a time. The sixteen quantities , then form the components
   of a tensor of the second rank, if they transform according to the
   scheme It follows from this that the behave, with respect to their
   properties of transformation and their properties of reality, as the
   products of components, of two 4-vectors, ( ) and ( ). All the
   components are real except those which contain the index 4 once, those
   being purely imaginary. Tensors [Pg 41] of the third and higher ranks
   may be defined in an analogous way. The operations of addition,
   subtraction, multiplication, contraction and differentiation for these
   tensors are wholly analogous to the corresponding operations for
   tensors in three-dimensional space.

   Before we apply the tensor theory to the four-dimensional space-time
   continuum, we shall examine more particularly the skew-symmetrical
   tensors. The tensor of the second rank has, in general, 16 = 4·4
   components. In the case of skew-symmetry the components with two equal
   indices vanish, and the components with unequal indices are equal and
   opposite in pairs. There exist, therefore, only six independent
   components, as is the case in the electromagnetic field. In fact, it
   will be shown when we consider Maxwell's equations that these may be
   looked upon as tensor equations, provided we regard the electromagnetic
   field as a skew-symmetrical tensor. Further, it is clear that the
   skew-symmetrical tensor of the third rank (skew-symmetrical in all
   pairs of indices) has only four independent components, since there are
   only four combinations of three different indices.

   We now turn to Maxwell's equations (19a), (19b), (20a), (20b), and
   introduce the notation:[25][10] with the convention that shall be equal
   to . Then [Pg 42] Maxwell's equations may be combined into the forms as
   one can easily verify by substituting from (30a) and (31). Equations
   (32) and (33) have a tensor character, and are therefore co-variant
   with respect to Lorentz transformations, if the and the have a tensor
   character, which we assume. Consequently, the laws for transforming
   these quantities from one to another allowable (inertial) system of
   co-ordinates are uniquely determined. The progress in method which
   electrodynamics owes to the theory of special relativity lies
   principally in this, that the number of independent hypotheses is
   diminished. If we consider, for example, equations (19a) only from the
   standpoint of relativity of direction, as we have done above, we see
   that they have three logically independent terms. The way in which the
   electric intensity enters these equations appears to be wholly
   independent of the way in which the magnetic intensity enters them; it
   would not be surprising if instead of , we had, say, or if this term
   were absent. On the other hand, only two independent terms appear in
   equation (32). The electromagnetic field appears as a formal unit; the
   way in which the electric field enters this equation is determined by
   the way in which the magnetic field enters it. Besides the
   electromagnetic field, only the electric current density appears as an
   independent entity. This advance in method arises from the fact that
   the [Pg 43] electric and magnetic fields draw their separate existences
   from the relativity of motion. A field which appears to be purely an
   electric field, judged from one system, has also magnetic field
   components when judged from another inertial system. When applied to an
   electromagnetic field, the general law of transformation furnishes, for
   the special case of the special Lorentz transformation, the equations

   [26][10]In order to avoid confusion from now on we shall use the
   three-dimensional space indices, , , instead of 1, 2, 3, and we shall
   reserve the numeral indices 1, 2, 3, 4 for the four-dimensional
   space-time continuum.

   If there exists with respect to only a magnetic field, , but no
   electric field, , then with respect to ' there exists an electric field
   as well, which would act upon an electric particle at rest relatively
   to '. An observer at rest relatively to would designate this force as
   the Biot-Savart force, or the Lorentz electromotive force. It therefore
   appears as if this electromotive force had become fused with the
   electric field intensity into a single entity.

   In order to view this relation formally, let us consider the expression
   for the force acting upon unit volume of electricity, in which is the
   vector velocity of electricity, with the velocity of light as the unit.
   If we introduce and according to (30a) and (31), we obtain for the
   first component the expression [Pg 44] Observing that vanishes on
   account of the skew-symmetry of the tensor ( ), the components of are
   given by the first three components of the four-dimensional vector and
   the fourth component is given by There is, therefore, a
   four-dimensional vector of force per unit volume, whose first three
   components, , , , are the ponderomotive force components per unit
   volume, and whose fourth component is the rate of working of the field
   per unit volume, multiplied by .

   A comparison of (36) and (35) shows that the theory of relativity
   formally unites the ponderomotive force of the electric field, , and
   the Biot-Savart or Lorentz force [ , ].

   Mass and Energy. An important conclusion can be drawn from the
   existence and significance of the 4-vector . Let us imagine a body upon
   which the electromagnetic field acts for a time. In the symbolic figure
   (Fig. 2) designates the -axis, and is at the same time a substitute for
   the three space axes , , ; designates the real time axis. In this
   diagram a body of finite extent is represented, at a definite time , by
   the interval the whole space-time existence of the body is represented
   by a strip whose boundary is everywhere inclined less than 45° to the
   -axis. Between the time sections, = and = , but not extending to them,
   a portion of the strip is shaded. This represents the portion of the
   space-time manifold [Pg 45] in which the electromagnetic field acts
   upon the body, or upon the electric charges contained in it, the action
   upon them being transmitted to the body. We shall now consider the
   changes which take place in the momentum and energy of the body as a
   result of this action.
   300

   FIG. 2.

   We shall assume that the principles of momentum and energy are valid
   for the body. The change in momentum, , , , and the change in energy,
   are then given [Pg 46] by the expressions Since the four-dimensional
   element of volume is an invariant, and ( , , , ) forms a 4-vector, the
   four-dimensional integral extended over the shaded portion transforms
   as a 4-vector, as does also the integral between the limits and ,
   because the portion of the region which is not shaded contributes
   nothing to the integral. It follows, therefore, that , , , form a
   4-vector. Since the quantities themselves transform in the same way as
   their increments, it follows that the aggregate of the four quantities
   has itself the properties of a vector; these quantities are referred to
   an instantaneous condition of the body (e.g. at the time = ).

   This 4-vector may also be expressed in terms of the mass , and the
   velocity of the body, considered as a material particle. To form this
   expression, we note first, that [Pg 47] is an invariant which refers to
   an infinitely short portion of the four-dimensional line which
   represents the motion of the material particle. The physical
   significance of the invariant may easily be given. If the time axis is
   chosen in such a way that it has the direction of the fine differential
   which we are considering, or, in other words, if we reduce the material
   particle to rest, we shall then have ; this will therefore be measured
   by the light-seconds clock which is at the same place, and at rest
   relatively to the material particle. We therefore call the proper time
   of the material particle. As opposed to , is therefore an invariant,
   and is practically equivalent to for motions whose velocity is small
   compared to that of fight. Hence we see that has, just as the , the
   character of a vector; we shall designate ( ) as the four-dimensional
   vector (in brief, 4-vector) of velocity. Its components satisfy, by
   (38), the condition We see that this 4-vector, whose components in the
   ordinary notation are is the only 4-vector which can be formed from the
   velocity components of the material particle which are defined in three
   dimensions by [Pg 48] We therefore see that must be that 4-vector which
   is to be equated to the 4-vector of momentum and energy whose existence
   we have proved above. By equating the components, we obtain, in
   three-dimensional notation,

   We recognize, in fact, that these components of momentum agree with
   those of classical mechanics for velocities which are small compared to
   that of light. For large velocities the momentum increases more rapidly
   than linearly with the velocity, so as to become infinite on
   approaching the velocity of light.

   If we apply the last of equations (43) to a material particle at rest (
   = 0), we see that the energy, of a, body at rest is equal to its mass.
   Had we chosen the second as our unit of time, we would have obtained
   Mass and energy are therefore essentially alike; they are only
   different expressions for the same thing. The mass of a body [Pg 49] is
   not a constant; it varies with changes in its energy.[27][11] We see
   from the last of equations (43) that becomes infinite when approaches
   1, the velocity of light. If we develop in powers of , we obtain, The
   second term of this expansion corresponds to the kinetic energy of the
   material particle in classical mechanics.

   [28][11]The emission of energy in radioactive processes is evidently
   connected with the fact that the atomic weights are not integers.
   Attempts have been made to draw conclusions from this concerning the
   structure and stability of the atomic nuclei.

   Equations of Motion of Material Particles. From (43) we obtain, by
   differentiating by the time , and using the principle of momentum, in
   the notation of three-dimensional vectors,

   This equation, which was previously employed by H. A. Lorentz for the
   motion of electrons, has been proved to be true, with great accuracy,
   by experiments with -rays.

   Energy Tensor of the Electromagnetic Field. Before the development of
   the theory of relativity it was known that the principles of energy and
   momentum could be expressed in a differential form for the
   electromagnetic field. The four-dimensional formulation of these
   principles leads to an important conception, [Pg 50] that of the energy
   tensor, which is important for the further development of the theory of
   relativity.

   If in the expression for the 4-vector of force per unit volume, using
   the field equations (32), we express in terms of the field intensities,
   , we obtain, after some transformations and repeated application of the
   field equations (32) and (33), the expression where we have
   written[29][12]

   [30][12]To be summed for the indices and .

   The physical meaning of equation (47) becomes evident if in place of
   this equation we write, using a new notation, [Pg 51] or, on
   eliminating the imaginary,

   When expressed in the latter form, we see that the first three
   equations state the principle of momentum; ,..., are the Maxwell
   stresses in the electromagnetic field, and ( , , ) is the vector
   momentum per unit volume of the field. The last of equations (47b)
   expresses the energy principle; is the vector flow of energy, and the
   energy per unit volume of the field. In fact, we get from (48) by
   introducing the well-known expressions for the components of the field
   intensity from electrodynamics, [Pg 52] We conclude from (48) that the
   energy tensor of the electromagnetic field is symmetrical; with this is
   connected the fact that the momentum per unit volume and the how of
   energy are equal to each other (relation between energy and inertia).

   We therefore conclude from these considerations that the energy per
   unit volume has the character of a tensor. This has been proved
   directly only for an electromagnetic field, although we may claim
   universal validity for it. Maxwell's equations determine the
   electromagnetic field when the distribution of electric charges and
   currents is known. But we do not know the laws which govern the
   currents and charges. We do know, indeed, that electricity consists of
   elementary particles (electrons, positive nuclei), but from a
   theoretical point of view we cannot comprehend this. We do not know the
   energy factors which determine the distribution of electricity in
   particles of definite size and charge, and all attempts to complete the
   theory in this direction have failed. If then we can build upon
   Maxwell's equations in general, the energy tensor of the
   electromagnetic field is known only outside the charged
   particles.[31][13] In these regions, outside of charged particles, the
   only regions in which we can believe that we have the complete
   expression for the energy tensor, we have, by (47),

   [32][13]It has been attempted to remedy this lack of knowledge by
   considering the charged particles as proper singularities. But in my
   opinion this means giving up a real understanding of the structure of
   matter. It seems to me much better to give in to our present inability
   rather than to be satisfied by a solution that is only apparent.

   [Pg 53]

   General Expressions for the Conservation Principles. We can hardly
   avoid making the assumption that in all other cases, also, the space
   distribution of energy is given by a symmetrical tensor, , and that
   this complete energy tensor everywhere satisfies the relation (47c). At
   any rate we shall see that by means of this assumption we obtain the
   correct expression for the integral energy principle.

   Let us consider a spatially bounded, closed system, which,
   four-dimensionally, we may represent as a strip, outside of which the
   vanish. Integrate equation (47c) over a space section. Since the
   integrals of , and vanish because the vanish at the limits of
   integration, we obtain Inside the parentheses are the expressions for
   the momentum of the whole system, multiplied by , together with the
   negative energy of the system, so that (49) expresses the conservation
   principles in their integral form. That this gives the right conception
   of energy and the conservation principles will be seen from the
   following considerations.

   PHENOMENOLOGICAL REPRESENTATION OF THE ENERGY TENSOR OF MATTER.

   Hydrodynamical Equations. We know that matter is built up of
   electrically charged particles, but we do not know the laws which
   govern the constitution of these particles. In treating mechanical
   problems, we are therefore obliged to make use of an [Pg 54] inexact
   description of matter, which corresponds to that of classical
   mechanics. The density , of a material substance and the hydrodynamical
   pressures are the fundamental concepts upon which such a description is
   based.
   300

   FIG. 3.

   Let be the density of matter at a place, estimated with reference to a
   system of co-ordinates moving with the matter. Then , the density at
   rest, is an invariant. If we think of the matter in arbitrary motion
   and neglect the pressures (particles of dust in vacuo, neglecting the
   size of the particles and the temperature), then the energy tensor will
   depend only upon the [Pg 55] velocity components, and . We secure the
   tensor character of by putting in which the , in the three-dimensional
   representation, are given by (41). In fact, it follows from (50) that
   for , (equal to the negative energy per unit volume), as it should,
   according to the theorem of the equivalence of mass and energy, and
   according to the physical interpretation of the energy tensor given
   above. If an external force (four-dimensional vector, ) acts upon the
   matter, by the principles of momentum and energy the equation must
   hold. We shall now show that this equation leads to the same law of
   motion of a material particle as that already obtained. Let us imagine
   the matter to be of infinitely small extent in space, that is, a
   four-dimensional thread; then by integration over the whole thread with
   respect to the space co-ordinates , , , we obtain

   Now is an invariant, as is, therefore, also . We shall calculate this
   integral, first with respect to the inertial system which we have
   chosen, and second, with respect to a system relatively to which the
   matter has the velocity zero. The integration is to be extended over a
   filament [Pg 56] of the thread for which may be regarded as constant
   over the whole section. If the space volumes of the filament referred
   to the two systems are and respectively, then we have and therefore
   also

   If we substitute the right-hand side for the left-hand side in the
   former integral, and put outside the sign of integration, we obtain, We
   see, therefore, that the generalized conception of the energy tensor is
   in agreement with our former result.

   The Eulerian Equations for Perfect Fluids. In order to get nearer to
   the behaviour of real matter we must add to the energy tensor a term
   which corresponds to the pressures. The simplest case is that of a
   perfect fluid in which the pressure is determined by a scalar . Since
   the tangential stresses , etc., vanish in this case, the contribution
   to the energy tensor must be of the form . We must therefore put [Pg
   57] At rest, the density of the matter, or the energy per unit volume,
   is in this case, not but . For In the absence of any force, we have If
   we multiply this equation by and sum for the 's we obtain, using (40),
   where we have put . This is the equation of continuity, which differs
   from that of classical mechanics by the term , which, practically, is
   vanishingly small. Observing (52), the conservation principles take the
   form The equations for the first three indices evidently correspond to
   the Eulerian equations. That the equations (52) and (53) correspond, to
   a first approximation, to the hydrodynamical equations of classical
   mechanics, is a further confirmation of the generalized energy
   principle. The density of matter and of energy has the character of a
   symmetrical tensor. [Pg 58]

LECTURE III
THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY

   ALL of the previous considerations have been based upon the assumption
   that all inertial systems are equivalent for the description of
   physical phenomena, but that they are preferred, for the formulation of
   the laws of nature, to spaces of reference in a different state of
   motion. We can think of no cause for this preference for definite
   states of motion to all others, according to our previous
   considerations, either in the perceptible bodies or in the concept of
   motion; on the contrary, it must be regarded as an independent property
   of the space-time continuum. The principle of inertia, in particular,
   seems to compel us to ascribe physically objective properties to the
   space-time continuum. Just as it was necessary from the Newtonian
   standpoint to make both the statements, tempus est absolutum, spatium
   est absolutum, so from the standpoint of the special theory of
   relativity we must say, continuum spatii et temporis est absolutum. In
   this latter statement absolutum means not only "physically real," but
   also "independent in its physical properties, having a physical effect,
   but not itself influenced by physical conditions."

   As long as the principle of inertia is regarded as the keystone of
   physics, this standpoint is certainly the only one which is justified.
   But there are two serious criticisms of the ordinary conception. In the
   first place, it is contrary to the mode of thinking in science to
   conceive of a thing (the space-time continuum) which acts itself, but
   which cannot be acted upon. This is the reason why E. Mach was led to
   make the attempt to eliminate space as an active cause in the system of
   mechanics. According [Pg 59] to him, a material particle does not move
   in unaccelerated motion relatively to space, but relatively to the
   centre of all the other masses in the universe; in this way the series
   of causes of mechanical phenomena was closed, in contrast to the
   mechanics of Newton and Galileo. In order to develop this idea within
   the limits of the modern theory of action through a medium, the
   properties of the space-time continuum which determine inertia must be
   regarded as field properties of space, analogous to the electromagnetic
   field. The concepts of classical mechanics afford no way of expressing
   this. For this reason Mach's attempt at a solution failed for the time
   being. We shall come back to this point of view later. In the second
   place, classical mechanics indicates a limitation which directly
   demands an extension of the principle of relativity to spaces of
   reference which are not in uniform motion relatively to each other. The
   ratio of the masses of two bodies is defined in mechanics in two ways
   which differ from each other fundamentally; in the first place, as the
   reciprocal ratio of the accelerations which the same motional force
   imparts to them (inert mass), and in the second place, as the ratio of
   the forces which act upon them in the same gravitational field
   (gravitational mass). The equality of these two masses, so differently
   defined, is a fact which is confirmed by experiments of very high
   accuracy (experiments of Eötvös), and classical mechanics offers no
   explanation for this equality. It is, however, clear that science is
   fully justified in assigning such a numerical equality only after this
   numerical equality is reduced to an equality of the real nature of the
   two concepts.

   That this object may actually be attained by an extension of the
   principle of relativity, follows from the following consideration. A
   little reflection will show that the theorem of the [Pg 60] equality of
   the inert and the gravitational mass is equivalent to the theorem that
   the acceleration imparted to a body by a gravitational field is
   independent of the nature of the body. For Newton's equation of motion
   in a gravitational field, written out in full, is It is only when there
   is numerical equality between the inert and gravitational mass that the
   acceleration is independent of the nature of the body. Let now be an
   inertial system. Masses which are sufficiently far from each other and
   from other bodies are then, with respect to , free from acceleration.
   We shall also refer these masses to a system of co-ordinates '
   uniformly accelerated with respect to . Relatively to ' all the masses
   have equal and parallel accelerations; with respect to ' they behave
   just as if a gravitational field were present and ' were unaccelerated.
   Overlooking for the present the question as to the "cause" of such a
   gravitational field, which will occupy us later, there is nothing to
   prevent our conceiving this gravitational field as real, that is, the
   conception that ' is "at rest" and a gravitational field is present we
   may consider as equivalent to the conception that only is an
   "allowable" system of co-ordinates and no gravitational field is
   present. The assumption of the complete physical equivalence of the
   systems of co-ordinates, and ', we call the "principle of equivalence;"
   this principle is evidently intimately connected with the theorem of
   the equality between the inert and the gravitational mass, and
   signifies an extension of the principle of relativity to co-ordinate
   systems which are in [Pg 61] non-uniform motion relatively to each
   other. In fact, through this conception we arrive at the unity of the
   nature of inertia and gravitation. For according to our way of looking
   at it, the same masses may appear to be either under the action of
   inertia alone (with respect to ) or under the combined action of
   inertia and gravitation (with respect to '). The possibility of
   explaining the numerical equality of inertia and gravitation by the
   unity of their nature gives to the general theory of relativity,
   according to my conviction, such a superiority over the conceptions of
   classical mechanics, that all the difficulties encountered in
   development must be considered as small in comparison.

   What justifies us in dispensing with the preference for inertial
   systems over all other co-ordinate systems, a preference that seems so
   securely established by experiment based upon the principle of inertia?
   The weakness of the principle of inertia lies in this, that it involves
   an argument in a circle: a mass moves without acceleration if it is
   sufficiently far from other bodies; we know that it is sufficiently far
   from other bodies only by the fact that it moves without acceleration.
   Are there, in general, any inertial systems for very extended portions
   of the space-time continuum, or, indeed, for the whole universe? We may
   look upon the principle of inertia as established, to a high degree of
   approximation, for the space of our planetary system, provided that we
   neglect the perturbations due to the sun and planets. Stated more
   exactly, there are finite regions, where, with respect to a suitably
   chosen space of reference, material particles move freely without
   acceleration, and in which the laws of the special theory of
   relativity, which have been developed above, hold with remarkable
   accuracy. Such regions we shall call "Galilean regions." We shall
   proceed from the consideration of such regions [Pg 62] as a special
   case of known properties.

   The principle of equivalence demands that in dealing with Galilean
   regions we may equally well make use of non-inertial systems, that is,
   such co-ordinate systems as, relatively to inertial systems, are not
   free from acceleration and rotation. If, further, we are going to do
   away completely with the difficult question as to the objective reason
   for the preference of certain systems of co-ordinates, then we must
   allow the use of arbitrarily moving systems of co-ordinates. As soon as
   we make this attempt seriously we come into conflict with that physical
   interpretation of space and time to which we were led by the special
   theory of relativity. For let ' be a system of co-ordinates whose
   '-axis coincides with the -axis of , and which rotates about the latter
   axis with constant angular velocity. Are the configurations of rigid
   bodies, at rest relatively to ', in accordance with the laws of
   Euclidean geometry? Since ' is not an inertial system, we do not know
   directly the laws of configuration of rigid bodies with respect to ',
   nor the laws of nature, in general. But we do know these laws with
   respect to the inertial system , and we can therefore estimate them
   with respect to '. Imagine a circle drawn about the origin in the plane
   of ' and a diameter of this circle. Imagine, further, that we have
   given a large number of rigid rods, all equal to each other. We suppose
   these laid in series along the periphery and the diameter of the
   circle, at rest relatively to '. If is the number of these rods along
   the periphery, the number along the diameter, then, if ' does not
   rotate relatively to , we shall have [Pg 63] But if ' rotates we get a
   different result. Suppose that at a definite time of we determine the
   ends of all the rods. With respect to all the rods upon the periphery
   experience the Lorentz contraction, but the rods upon the diameter do
   not experience this contraction (along their lengths!).[33][14] It
   therefore follows that

   It therefore follows that the laws of configuration of rigid bodies
   with respect to ' do not agree with the laws of configuration of rigid
   bodies that are in accordance with Euclidean geometry. If, further, we
   place two similar clocks (rotating with '), one upon the periphery, and
   the other at the centre of the circle, then, judged from , the clock on
   the periphery will go slower than the clock at the centre. The same
   thing must take place, judged from ', if we define time with respect to
   ' in a not wholly unnatural way, that is, in such a way that the laws
   with respect to ' depend explicitly upon the time. Space and time,
   therefore, cannot be defined with respect to ' as they were in the
   special theory of relativity with respect to inertial systems. But,
   according to the principle of equivalence, ' is also to be considered
   as a system at rest, with respect to which there is a gravitational
   field (field of centrifugal force, and force of Coriolis). We therefore
   arrive at the result: the gravitational field influences and even
   determines the metrical laws of the space-time continuum. If the laws
   of configuration of ideal rigid bodies are to be expressed
   geometrically, then in the presence of a gravitational field the
   geometry is not Euclidean.

   [34][14]These considerations assume that the behaviour of rods and
   clocks depends only upon velocities, and not upon accelerations, or, at
   least, that the influence of acceleration does not counteract that of
   velocity.

   [Pg 64]

   The case that we have been considering is analogous to that which is
   presented in the two-dimensional treatment of surfaces. It is
   impossible in the latter case also, to introduce co-ordinates on a
   surface (e.g. the surface of an ellipsoid) which have a simple metrical
   significance, while on a plane the Cartesian co-ordinates, , , signify
   directly lengths measured by a unit measuring rod. Gauss overcame this
   difficulty, in his theory of surfaces, by introducing curvilinear
   co-ordinates which, apart from satisfying conditions of continuity,
   were wholly arbitrary, and afterwards these co-ordinates were related
   to the metrical properties of the surface. In an analogous way we shall
   introduce in the general theory of relativity arbitrary co-ordinates, ,
   , , , which shall number uniquely the space-time points, so that
   neighbouring events are associated with neighbouring values of the
   co-ordinates; otherwise, the choice of co-ordinates is arbitrary. We
   shall be true to the principle of relativity in its broadest sense if
   we give such a form to the laws that they are valid in every such
   four-dimensional system of co-ordinates, that is, if the equations
   expressing the laws are co-variant with respect to arbitrary
   transformations.

   The most important point of contact between Gauss's theory of surfaces
   and the general theory of relativity lies in the metrical properties
   upon which the concepts of both theories, in the main, are based. In
   the case of the theory of surfaces, Gauss's argument is as follows.
   Plane geometry may be based upon the concept of the distance , between
   two indefinitely near points. The concept of this distance is
   physically significant because the distance can be measured directly by
   means of a rigid measuring rod. By a suitable choice of Cartesian
   co-ordinates this [Pg 65] distance may be expressed by the formula . We
   may base upon this quantity the concepts of the straight line as the
   geodesic ( ), the interval, the circle, and the angle, upon which the
   Euclidean plane geometry is built. A geometry may be developed upon
   another continuously curved surface, if we observe that an
   infinitesimally small portion of the surface may be regarded as plane,
   to within relatively infinitesimal quantities. There are Cartesian
   co-ordinates, , , upon such a small portion of the surface, and the
   distance between two points, measured by a measuring rod, is given by
   If we introduce arbitrary curvilinear co-ordinates, , , on the surface,
   then , , may be expressed linearly in terms of , . Then everywhere upon
   the surface we have where , , are determined by the nature of the
   surface and the choice of co-ordinates; if these quantities are known,
   then it is also known how networks of rigid rods may be laid upon the
   surface. In other words, the geometry of surfaces may be based upon
   this expression for exactly as plane geometry is based upon the
   corresponding expression.

   There are analogous relations in the four-dimensional space-time
   continuum of physics. In the immediate neighbourhood of an observer,
   falling freely in a gravitational field, there exists no gravitational
   field. We can therefore always regard an infinitesimally small region
   of the space-time continuum as Galilean. For such an infinitely small
   region there will be an inertial system (with the space co-ordinates, ,
   , , and the time [Pg 66] co-ordinate ) relatively to which we are to
   regard the laws of the special theory of relativity as valid. The
   quantity which is directly measurable by our unit measuring rods and
   clocks, or its negative, is therefore a uniquely determinate invariant
   for two neighbouring events (points in the four-dimensional continuum),
   provided that we use measuring rods that are equal to each other when
   brought together and superimposed, and clocks whose rates are the same
   when they are brought together. In this the physical assumption is
   essential that the relative lengths of two measuring rods and the
   relative rates of two clocks are independent, in principle, of their
   previous history. But this assumption is certainly warranted by
   experience; if it did not hold there could be no sharp spectral lines;
   for the single atoms of the same element certainly do not have the same
   history, and it would be absurd to suppose any relative difference in
   the structure of the single atoms due to their previous history if the
   mass and frequencies of the single atoms of the same element were
   always the same.

   Space-time regions of finite extent are, in general, not Galilean, so
   that a gravitational field cannot be done away with by any choice of
   co-ordinates in a finite region. There is, therefore, no choice of
   co-ordinates for which the metrical relations of the special theory of
   relativity hold in a finite region. But the invariant always exists for
   two neighbouring points (events) of the continuum. This invariant may
   be [Pg 67] expressed in arbitrary co-ordinates. If one observes that
   the local may be expressed linearly in terms of the co-ordinate
   differentials , may be expressed in the form

   The functions describe, with respect to the arbitrarily chosen system
   of co-ordinates, the metrical relations of the space-time continuum and
   also the gravitational field. As in the special theory of relativity,
   we have to discriminate between time-like and space-like line elements
   in the four-dimensional continuum; owing to the change of sign
   introduced, time-like line elements have a real, space-like line
   elements an imaginary . The time-like can be measured directly by a
   suitably chosen clock.

   According to what has been said, it is evident that the formulation of
   the general theory of relativity assumes a generalization of the theory
   of invariants and the theory of tensors; the question is raised as to
   the form of the equations which are co-variant with respect to
   arbitrary point transformations. The generalized calculus of tensors
   was developed by mathematicians long before the theory of relativity.
   Riemann first extended Gauss's train of thought to continua of any
   number of dimensions; with prophetic vision he saw the physical meaning
   of this generalization of Euclid's geometry. Then followed the
   development of the theory in the form of the calculus of tensors,
   particularly by Ricci and Levi-Civita. This is the place for a brief
   presentation of the most important mathematical concepts and operations
   of this calculus of tensors.

   We designate four quantities, which are defined as functions of the
   with respect to every system of co-ordinates, as components, [Pg 68] ,
   of a contra-variant vector, if they transform in a change of
   co-ordinates as the co-ordinate differentials . We therefore have
   Besides these contra-variant vectors, there are also co-variant
   vectors. If are the components of a co-variant vector, these vectors
   are transformed according to the rule The definition of a co-variant
   vector is chosen in such a way that a co-variant vector and a
   contra-variant vector together form a scalar according to the scheme,
   Accordingly, In particular, the derivatives of a scalar , are
   components of a co-variant vector, which, with the co-ordinate
   differentials, form the scalar ; we see from this example how natural
   is the definition of the co-variant vectors.

   There are here, also, tensors of any rank, which may have co-variant or
   contra-variant character with respect to each index; as with vectors,
   the character is designated by the position [Pg 69] of the index. For
   example, denotes a tensor of the second rank, which is co-variant with
   respect to the index , and contra-variant with respect to the index .
   The tensor character indicates that the equation of transformation is

   Tensors may be formed by the addition and subtraction of tensors of
   equal rank and like character, as in the theory of invariants of
   orthogonal linear substitutions, for example, The proof of the tensor
   character of depends upon (58).

   Tensors may be formed by multiplication, keeping the character of the
   indices, just as in the theory of invariants of linear orthogonal
   transformations, for example, The proof follows directly from the rule
   of transformation.

   Tensors may be formed by contraction with respect to two indices of
   different character, for example, The tensor character of determines
   the tensor character of . Proof— [Pg 70]

   The properties of symmetry and skew-symmetry of a tensor with respect
   to two indices of like character have the same significance as in the
   theory of invariants.

   With this, everything essential has been said with regard to the
   algebraic properties of tensors.

   The Fundamental Tensor. It follows from the invariance of for an
   arbitrary choice of the , in connexion with the condition of symmetry
   consistent with (55), that the are components of a symmetrical
   co-variant tensor (Fundamental Tensor). Let us form the determinant, ,
   of the , and also the minors, divided by , corresponding to the single
   . These minors, divided by , will be denoted by , and their co-variant
   character is not yet known. Then we have

   If we form the infinitely small quantities (co-variant vectors)
   multiply by and sum over the , we obtain, by the use of (62), Since the
   ratios of the , are arbitrary, and the as well as the are components of
   vectors, it follows that the are the components of a contra-variant
   tensor[35][15] (contra-variant fundamental tensor). The tensor
   character of (mixed fundamental [Pg 71] tensor) accordingly follows, by
   (62). By means of the fundamental tensor, instead of tensors with
   co-variant index character, we can introduce tensors with
   contra-variant index character, and conversely. For example,

   [36][15]If we multiply (64) by , sum over the , and replace the by a
   transformation to the accented system, we obtain The statement made
   above follows from this, since, by (64), we must also have and both
   equations must hold for every choice of .

   Volume Invariants. The volume element is not an invariant. For by
   Jacobi's theorem, But we can complement so that it becomes an
   invariant. If we form the determinant of the quantities [Pg 72] we
   obtain, by a double application of the theorem of multiplication of
   determinants, We therefore get the invariant,

   Formation of Tensors by Differentiation. Although the algebraic
   operations of tensor formation have proved to be as simple as in the
   special case of invariance with respect to linear orthogonal
   transformations, nevertheless in the general case, the invariant
   differential operations are, unfortunately, considerably more
   complicated. The reason for this is as follows. If is a contra-variant
   vector, the coefficients of its transformation, , are independent of
   position only if the transformation is a linear one. For then the
   vector components, , at a neighbouring point transform in the same way
   as the , from which follows the vector character of the vector
   differentials, and the tensor character of . But if the are variable
   this is no longer true.

   That there are, nevertheless, in the general case, invariant
   differential operations for tensors, is recognized most satisfactorily
   in the following way, introduced by Levi-Civita and Weyl. Let ( ) be a
   contra-variant vector whose components are given with respect to the
   co-ordinate system of the . Let and [Pg 73] be two infinitesimally near
   points of the continuum. For the infinitesimal region surrounding the
   point , there is, according to our way of considering the matter, a
   co-ordinate system of the (with imaginary -co-ordinate) for which the
   continuum is Euclidean. Let be the co-ordinates of the vector at the
   point . Imagine a vector drawn at the point , using the local system of
   the , with the same co-ordinates (parallel vector through ), then this
   parallel vector is uniquely determined by the vector at and the
   displacement. We designate this operation, whose uniqueness will appear
   in the sequel, the parallel displacement of the vector from to the
   infinitesimally near point . If we form the vector difference of the
   vector ( ) at the point and the vector obtained by parallel
   displacement from to , we get a vector which may be regarded as the
   differential of the vector ( ) for the given displacement .

   This vector displacement can naturally also be considered with respect
   to the co-ordinate system of the . If are the co-ordinates of the
   vector at , the co-ordinates of the vector displaced to along the
   interval ( ), then the do not vanish in this case. We know of these
   quantities, which do not have a vector character, that they must depend
   linearly and homogeneously upon the and the . We therefore put

   In addition, we can state that the must be symmetrical with respect to
   the indices and . For we can assume from a representation by the aid of
   a Euclidean system of local co-ordinates that the same parallelogram
   will be described by the displacement of an element along a second
   element [Pg 74] as by a displacement of along . We must therefore have
   The statement made above follows from this, after interchanging the
   indices of summation, and , on the right-hand side.

   Since the quantities determine all the metrical properties of the
   continuum, they must also determine the . If we consider the invariant
   of the vector that is, the square of its magnitude, which is an
   invariant, this cannot change in a parallel displacement. We therefore
   have or, by (67),

   Owing to the symmetry of the expression in the brackets with respect to
   the indices and , this equation can be valid for an arbitrary choice of
   the vectors ( ) and only when the expression in the brackets vanishes
   for all combinations of the indices. By a cyclic interchange of the
   indices , , , we obtain thus altogether three equations, from which we
   obtain, on taking into account the symmetrical property of the , [Pg
   75] in which, following Christoffel, the abbreviation has been used,

   If we multiply (68) by and sum over the , we obtain in which is the
   Christoffel symbol of the second kind. Thus the quantities are deduced
   from the . Equations (67) and (70) are the foundation for the following
   discussion.

   Co-variant Differentiation of Tensors. If ( ) is the vector resulting
   from an infinitesimal parallel displacement from to , and ( ) the
   vector at the point , then the difference of these two, is also a
   vector. Since this is the case for an arbitrary choice of the , it
   follows that is a tensor, which we designate as the co-variant
   derivative of the tensor of the first rank (vector). Contracting this
   tensor, we obtain the divergence of the contra-variant tensor . In this
   we must observe that according to (70), [Pg 76] If we put, further, a
   quantity designated by Weyl as the contra-variant tensor
   density[37][16] of the first rank, it follows that, is a scalar
   density.

   [38][16]This expression is justified, in that has a tensor character.
   Every tensor, when multiplied by , changes into a tensor density. We
   employ capital Gothic letters for tensor densities.

   We get the law of parallel displacement for the co-variant vector by
   stipulating that the parallel displacement shall be effected in such a
   way that the scalar remains unchanged, and that therefore vanishes for
   every value assigned to ( ). We therefore get

   From this we arrive at the co-variant derivative of the co-variant
   vector by the same process as that which led to (71), [Pg 77] By
   interchanging the indices and , and subtracting, we get the
   skew-symmetrical tensor,

   For the co-variant differentiation of tensors of the second and higher
   ranks we may use the process by which (75) was deduced. Let, for
   example, ( ) be a co-variant tensor of the second rank. Then is a
   scalar, if and are vectors. This expression must not be changed by the
   -displacement; expressing this by a formula, we get, using (67), ,
   whence we get the desired co-variant derivative,

   In order that the general law of co-variant differentiation of tensors
   may be clearly seen, we shall write down two co-variant derivatives
   deduced in an analogous way: The general law of formation now becomes
   evident. From these formulae we shall deduce some others which are of
   interest for the physical applications of the theory.

   In case is skew-symmetrical, we obtain the tensor [Pg 78] which is
   skew-symmetrical in all pairs of indices, by cyclic interchange and
   addition.

   If, in (78), we replace by the fundamental tensor, , then the
   right-hand side vanishes identically; an analogous statement holds for
   (80) with respect to ; that is, the co-variant derivatives of the
   fundamental tensor vanish. That this must be so we see directly in the
   local system of co-ordinates.

   In case is skew-symmetrical, we obtain from (80), by contraction with
   respect to and ,

   In the general case, from (79) and (80), by contraction with respect to
   and , we obtain the equations,

   The Riemann Tensor. If we have given a curve extending from the point
   to the point of the continuum, then a vector , given at , may, by a
   parallel displacement, be moved along the curve to . If the continuum
   is Euclidean (more generally, if by a suitable choice of co-ordinates
   the , are constants) then the vector obtained at as a result of this
   displacement does not depend upon the choice of the curve joining and .
   But otherwise, the result depends upon the path of the displacement.
   300

   FIG.4.

   In this case, therefore, a vector suffers a change, (in its direction,
   not its magnitude), when it is carried from a [Pg 79] point of a closed
   curve, along the curve, and back to P. We shall now calculate this
   vector change: As in Stokes' theorem for the line integral of a vector
   around a closed curve, this problem may be reduced to the integration
   around a closed curve with infinitely small linear dimensions; we shall
   limit ourselves to this case.

   We have, first, by (67),

   In this, is the value of this quantity at the variable point of the
   path of integration. If we put [Pg 80] and denote the value of at by
   then we have, with sufficient accuracy,

   Let, further, be the value obtained from by a parallel displacement
   along the curve from to . It may now easily be proved by means of (67)
   that - is infinitely small of the first order, while, for a curve of
   infinitely small dimensions of the first order, is infinitely small of
   the second order. Therefore there is an error of only the second order
   if we put

   If we introduce these values of and into the integral, we obtain,
   neglecting all quantities of a higher order of small quantities than
   the second, The quantity removed from under the sign of integration
   refers to the point . Subtracting from the integrand, we obtain This
   skew-symmetrical tensor of the second rank, , characterizes the surface
   element bounded by the curve in magnitude and position. If the
   expression in the brackets in (85) were skew-symmetrical with respect
   to the indices and , we could [Pg 81] conclude its tensor character
   from (85). We can accomplish this by interchanging the summation
   indices and in (85) and adding the resulting equation to (85). We
   obtain in which

   The tensor character of follows from (86); this is the Riemann
   curvature tensor of the fourth rank, whose properties of symmetry we do
   not need to go into. Its vanishing is a sufficient condition
   (disregarding the reality of the chosen co-ordinates) that the
   continuum is Euclidean.

   By contraction of the Riemann tensor with respect to the indices , , we
   obtain the symmetrical tensor of the second rank, The last two terms
   vanish if the system of co-ordinates is so chosen that . From , we can
   form the scalar,

   Straightest Geodetic Lines. A line may be constructed in such a way
   that its successive elements arise from each other by parallel
   displacements. This is the natural generalization of the straight line
   of the Euclidean geometry. For such a line, we have [Pg 82] The
   left-hand side is to be replaced by ,[39][17] so that we have We get
   the same line if we find the line which gives a stationary value to the
   integral between two points (geodetic line).

   [40][17]The direction vector at a neighbouring point of the curve
   results, by a parallel displacement along the line element ( ), from
   the direction vector of each point considered.

   [Pg 83]

LECTURE IV
THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY
(continued)

   WE are now in possession of the mathematical apparatus which is
   necessary to formulate the laws of the general theory of relativity. No
   attempt will be made in this presentation at systematic completeness,
   but single results and possibilities will be developed progressively
   from what is known and from the results obtained. Such a presentation
   is most suited to the present provisional state of our knowledge.

   A material particle upon which no force acts moves, according to the
   principle of inertia, uniformly in a straight line. In the
   four-dimensional continuum of the special theory of relativity (with
   real time co-ordinate) this is a real straight line. The natural, that
   is, the simplest, generalization of the straight line which is
   plausible in the system of concepts of Riemann's general theory of
   invariants is that of the straightest, or geodetic, line. We shall
   accordingly have to assume, in the sense of the principle of
   equivalence, that the motion of a material particle, under the action
   only of inertia and gravitation, is described by the equation, In fact,
   this equation reduces to that of a straight line if all the components,
   , of the gravitational field vanish.

   How are these equations connected with Newton's equations of motion?
   According to the special theory of relativity, the as well as the ,
   have the values, with respect to an inertial [Pg 84] system (with real
   time co-ordinate and suitable choice of the sign of ), The equations of
   motion then become We shall call this the "first approximation" to the
   -field. In considering approximations it is often useful, as in the
   special theory of relativity, to use an imaginary -co-ordinate, as then
   the . to the first approximation, assume the values These values may be
   collected in the relation To the second approximation we must then put
   where the are to be regarded as small of the first order. [Pg 85]

   Both terms of our equation of motion are then small of the first order.
   If we neglect terms which, relatively to these, are small of the first
   order, we have to put We shall now introduce an approximation of a
   second kind. Let the velocity of the material particles be very small
   compared to that of light. Then will be the same as the time
   differential, . Further, , , will vanish compared to . We shall assume,
   in addition, that the gravitational field varies so little with the
   time that the derivatives of the by may be neglected. Then the equation
   of motion (for = 1,2,3) reduces to This equation is identical with
   Newton's equation of motion for a material particle in a gravitational
   field, if we identify with the potential of the gravitational field;
   whether or not this is allowable, naturally depends upon the field
   equations of gravitation, that is, it depends upon whether or not this
   quantity satisfies, to a first approximation, the same laws of the
   field as the gravitational potential in Newton's theory. A glance at
   (90) and (90a) shows that the actually do play the rôle of the
   intensity of the gravitational field. These quantities do not have a
   tensor character.

   Equations (90) express the influence of inertia and gravitation upon
   the material particle. The unity of inertia and gravitation [Pg 86] is
   formally expressed by the fact that the whole left-hand side of (90)
   has the character of a tensor (with respect to any transformation of
   co-ordinates), but the two terms taken separately do not have tensor
   character, so that, in analogy with Newton's equations, the first term
   would be regarded as the expression for inertia, and the second as the
   expression for the gravitational force.

   We must next attempt to find the laws of the gravitational field. For
   this purpose, Poisson's equation, of the Newtonian theory must serve as
   a model. This equation has its foundation in the idea that the
   gravitational field arises from the density of ponderable matter. It
   must also be so in the general theory of relativity. But our
   investigations of the special theory of relativity have shown that in
   place of the scalar density of matter we have the tensor of energy per
   unit volume. In the latter is included not only the tensor of the
   energy of ponderable matter, but also that of the electromagnetic
   energy. We have seen, indeed, that in a more complete analysis the
   energy tensor can be regarded only as a provisional means of
   representing matter. In reality, matter consists of electrically
   charged particles, and is to be regarded itself as a part, in fact, the
   principal part, of the electromagnetic field. It is only the
   circumstance that we have not sufficient knowledge of the
   electromagnetic field of concentrated charges that compels us,
   provisionally, to leave undetermined in presenting the theory, the true
   form of this tensor. From this point of view our problem now is to
   introduce a tensor, . of the second rank, [Pg 87] whose structure we do
   not know provisionally, and which includes in itself the energy density
   of the electromagnetic field and of ponderable matter; we shall denote
   this in the following as the "energy tensor of matter."

   According to our previous results, the principles of momentum and
   energy are expressed by the statement that the divergence of this
   tensor vanishes (47c). In the general theory of relativity, we shall
   have to assume as valid the corresponding general co-variant equation.
   If ( ) denotes the co-variant energy tensor of matter, the
   corresponding mixed tensor density, then, in accordance with (83), we
   must require that be satisfied. It must be remembered that besides the
   energy density of the matter there must also be given an energy density
   of the gravitational field, so that there can be no talk of principles
   of conservation of energy and momentum for matter alone. This is
   expressed mathematically by the presence of the second term in (95),
   which makes it impossible to conclude the existence of an integral
   equation of the form of (49). The gravitational field transfers energy
   and momentum to the "matter," in that it exerts forces upon it and
   gives it energy; this is expressed by the second term in (95).

   If there is an analogue of Poisson's equation in the general theory of
   relativity, then this equation must be a tensor equation for the tensor
   of the gravitational potential; the energy tensor of matter must appear
   on the right-hand side of this equation. On the left-hand side of the
   equation there must be a differential tensor in the . We have to find
   this differential [Pg 88] tensor. It is completely determined by the
   following three conditions:—

   1. It may contain no differential coefficients of the higher than the
   second.

   2. It must be linear and homogeneous in these second differential
   coefficients.

   3. Its divergence must vanish identically.

   The first two of these conditions are naturally taken from Poisson's
   equation. Since it may be proved mathematically that all such
   differential tensors can be formed algebraically (i.e. without
   differentiation) from Riemann's tensor, our tensor must be of the form
   in which and are defined by (88) and (89) respectively. Further, it may
   be proved that the third condition requires a to have the value . For
   the law of the gravitational field we therefore get the equation
   Equation (95) is a consequence of this equation. denotes a constant,
   which is connected with the Newtonian gravitation constant.

   In the following I shall indicate the features of the theory which are
   interesting from the point of view of physics, using as little as
   possible of the rather involved mathematical method. It must first be
   shown that the divergence of the left-hand side actually vanishes. The
   energy principle for matter may be expressed, by (83), [Pg 89] in which
   The analogous operation, applied to the left-hand side of (96), will
   lead to an identity.

   In the region surrounding each world-point there are systems of
   co-ordinates for which, choosing the -co-ordinate imaginary, at the
   given point, and for which the first derivatives of the and the vanish.
   We shall verify the vanishing of the divergence of the left-hand side
   at this point. At this point the components vanish, so that we have to
   prove the vanishing only of Introducing (88) and (70) into this
   expression, we see that the only terms that remain are those in which
   third derivatives of the enter. Since the are to be replaced by , we
   obtain, finally, only a few terms which may easily be seen to cancel
   each other. Since the quantity that we have formed has a tensor
   character, its vanishing is proved for every other system of
   co-ordinates also, and naturally for every other four-dimensional
   point. The energy principle of matter (97) is thus a mathematical
   consequence of the field equations (96).

   In order to learn whether the equations (96) are consistent with
   experience, we must, above all else, find out whether they [Pg 90] lead
   to the Newtonian theory as a first approximation. For this purpose we
   must introduce various approximations into these equations. We already
   know that Euclidean geometry and the law of the constancy of the
   velocity of light are valid, to a certain approximation, in regions of
   a great extent, as in the planetary system. If, as in the special
   theory of relativity, we take the fourth co-ordinate imaginary, this
   means that we must put in which the are so small compared to 1 that we
   can neglect the higher powers of the and their derivatives. If we do
   this, we learn nothing about the structure of the gravitational held,
   or of metrical space of cosmical dimensions, but we do learn about the
   influence of neighbouring masses upon physical phenomena.

   Before carrying through this approximation we shall transform (96). We
   multiply (96) by , summed over the and observing the relation which
   follows from the definition of the , we obtain the equation If we put
   this value of in (96) we obtain When the approximation which has been
   mentioned is carried out, we obtain for the left-hand side, [Pg 91] or
   in which has been put

   We must now note that equation (96) is valid for any system of
   co-ordinates. We have already specialized the system of co-ordinates in
   that we have chosen it so that within the region considered the differ
   infinitely little from the constant values . But this condition remains
   satisfied in any infinitesimal change of co-ordinates, so that there
   are still four conditions to which the may be subjected, provided these
   conditions do not conflict with the conditions for the order of
   magnitude of the . We shall now assume that the system of co-ordinates
   is so chosen that the four relations— are satisfied. Then (96a) takes
   the form These equations may be solved by the method, familiar in
   electrodynamics, of retarded potentials; we get, in an easily
   understood notation, [Pg 92]

   In order to see in what sense this theory contains the Newtonian
   theory, we must consider in greater detail the energy tensor of matter.
   Considered phenomenologically, this energy tensor is composed of that
   of the electromagnetic field and of matter in the narrower sense. If we
   consider the different parts of this energy tensor with respect to
   their order of magnitude, it follows from the results of the special
   theory of relativity that the contribution of the electromagnetic field
   practically vanishes in comparison to that of ponderable matter. In our
   system of units, the energy of one gram of matter is equal to 1,
   compared to which the energy of the electric fields may be ignored, and
   also the energy of deformation of matter, and even the chemical energy.
   We get an approximation that is fully sufficient for our purpose if we
   put In this, is the density at rest, that is, the density of the
   ponderable matter, in the ordinary sense, measured with the aid of a
   unit measuring rod, and referred to a Galilean system of co-ordinates
   moving with the matter.

   We observe, further, that in the co-ordinates we have chosen, we shall
   make only a relatively small error if we replace the by , so that we
   put

   The previous developments are valid however rapidly the masses which
   generate the field may move relatively to our chosen system of
   quasi-Galilean co-ordinates. But in astronomy [Pg 93] we have to do
   with masses whose velocities, relatively to the co-ordinate system
   employed, are always small compared to the velocity of light, that is,
   small compared to 1, with our choice of the unit of time. We therefore
   get an approximation which is sufficient for nearly all practical
   purposes if in (101) we replace the retarded potential by the ordinary
   (non-retarded) potential, and if, for the masses which generate the
   field, we put Then we get for and the values For we get the value ,
   and, finally, for the values,

   We thus get, from (101), [Pg 94] while all the other , vanish. The
   least of these equations, in connexion with equation (90a), contains
   Newton's theory of gravitation. If we replace by we get We see that the
   Newtonian gravitation constant , is connected with the constant that
   enters into our field equations by the relation From the known
   numerical value of , it therefore follows that From (101) we see that
   even in the first approximation the structure of the gravitational
   field differs fundamentally from that which is consistent with the
   Newtonian theory; this difference lies in the fact that the
   gravitational potential has the character of a tensor and not a scalar.
   This was not recognized in the past because only the component , to a
   first approximation, enters the equations of motion of material
   particles.

   In order now to be able to judge the behaviour of measuring rods and
   clocks from our results, we must observe the following. According to
   the principle of equivalence, the metrical relations of the Euclidean
   geometry are valid relatively to a Cartesian system of reference of
   infinitely small dimensions, and in a suitable state of motion (freely
   falling, and without rotation). We can make the same statement for
   local systems of co-ordinates [Pg 95] which, relatively to these, have
   small accelerations, and therefore for such systems of co-ordinates as
   are at rest relatively to the one we have selected. For such a local
   system, we have, for two neighbouring point events, where is measured
   directly by a measuring rod and by a clock at rest relatively to the
   system; these are the naturally measured lengths and times. Since , on
   the other hand, is known in terms of the co-ordinates employed in
   finite regions, in the form we have the possibility of getting the
   relation between naturally measured lengths and times, on the one hand,
   and the corresponding differences of co-ordinates, on the other hand.
   As the division into space and time is in agreement with respect to the
   two systems of co-ordinates, so when we equate the two expressions for
   we get two relations. If, by (101a), we put we obtain, to a
   sufficiently close approximation, [Pg 96]

   The unit measuring rod has therefore the length, in respect to the
   system of co-ordinates we have selected. The particular system of
   co-ordinates we have selected insures that this length shall depend
   only upon the place, and not upon the direction. If we had chosen a
   different system of co-ordinates this would not be so. But however we
   may choose a system of co-ordinates, the laws of configuration of rigid
   rods do not agree with those of Euclidean geometry; in other words, we
   cannot choose any system of co-ordinates so that the co-ordinate
   differences, , , , corresponding to the ends of a unit measuring rod,
   oriented in any way, shall always satisfy the relation . In this sense
   space is not Euclidean, but "curved." It follows from the second of the
   relations above that the interval between two beats of the unit clock (
   = 1) corresponds to the "time" in the unit used in our system of
   co-ordinates. The rate of a clock is accordingly slower the greater is
   the mass of the ponderable matter in its neighbourhood. We therefore
   conclude that spectral lines which are produced on the sun's surface
   will be displaced towards the red, compared to the corresponding lines
   produced on the earth, by about 2 • 10^-6 of their wave-lengths. At
   first, this important consequence of the theory appeared to conflict
   with experiment; but results obtained during the past year seem to make
   the existence of this effect more probable, and [Pg 97] it can hardly
   be doubted that this consequence of the theory will be confirmed within
   the next year.

   Another important consequence of the theory, which can be tested
   experimentally, has to do with the path of rays of light. In the
   general theory of relativity also the velocity of fight is everywhere
   the same, relatively to a local inertial system. This velocity is unity
   in our natural measure of time. The law of the propagation of light in
   general co-ordinates is therefore, according to the general theory of
   relativity, characterized, by the equation To within the approximation
   which we are using, and in the system of co-ordinates which we have
   selected, the velocity of light is characterized, according to (106),
   by the equation The velocity of light , is therefore expressed in our
   co-ordinates by We can therefore draw the conclusion from this, that a
   ray of light passing near a large mass is deflected. If we imagine the
   sun, of mass concentrated at the origin of our system of co-ordinates,
   then a ray of fight, travelling parallel to the -axis. in the plane, at
   a distance from the origin, will be deflected, in all, by an amount [Pg
   98] towards the sun. On performing the integration we get

   The existence of this deflection, which amounts to 1.7'' for equal to
   the radius of the sun, was confirmed, with remarkable accuracy, by the
   English Solar Eclipse Expedition in 1919, and most careful preparations
   have been made to get more exact observational data at the solar
   eclipse in 1922. It should be noted that this result, also, of the
   theory is not influenced by our arbitrary choice of a system of
   co-ordinates.

   This is the place to speak of the third consequence of the theory which
   can be tested by observation, namely, that which concerns the motion of
   the perihelion of the planet Mercury. The secular changes in the
   planetary orbits are known with such accuracy that the approximation we
   have been using is no longer sufficient for a comparison of theory and
   observation. It is necessary to go back to the general field equations
   (96). To solve this problem I made use of the method of successive
   approximations. Since then, however, the problem of the central
   symmetrical statical gravitational field has been completely solved by
   Schwarzschild and others; the derivation given by H. Weyl in his book,
   "Raum-Zeit-Materie," is particularly elegant. The calculation can be
   simplified somewhat if we do not go back directly to the equation (96),
   but base it upon a principle of variation that is equivalent to this
   equation. I shall indicate the procedure only in so far as is necessary
   for understanding the method. [Pg 99]

   In the case of a statical field, must have the form where the summation
   on the right-hand side of the last equation is to be extended over the
   space variables only. The central symmetry of the field requires the ,
   to be of the form, , and are functions of only. One of these three
   functions can be chosen arbitrarily, because our system of co-ordinates
   is, a priori, completely arbitrary; for by a substitution we can always
   insure that one of these three functions shall be an assigned function
   of '. In place of (110) we can therefore put, without limiting the
   generality,

   In this way the are expressed in terms of the two quantities and .
   These are to be determined as functions of , by introducing them into
   equation (96), after first calculating [Pg 100] the from (109) and
   (110a). We have

   With the help of these results, the field equations furnish
   Schwarzschild's solution: in which we have put

   denotes the sun's mass, centrally symmetrically placed about the origin
   of co-ordinates; the solution (109) is valid only outside of this mass,
   where all the vanish. If the motion of the planet takes place in the
   plane then we must replace (109a) by [Pg 101]

   The calculation of the planetary motion depends upon equation (90).
   From the first of equations (110b) and (90) we get, for the indices 1,
   2, 3, or, if we integrate, and express the result in polar
   co-ordinates,

   From (90), for = 4, we get From this, after multiplication by and
   integration, we have

   In (109c), (111) and (112) we have three equations between the four
   variables , , and , from which the motion of the planet may be
   calculated in the same way as in classical mechanics. The most
   important result we get from this is a secular rotation of the elliptic
   orbit of the planet in the same sense as the revolution of the planet,
   amounting in radians per revolution to [Pg 102] where This expression
   furnishes the explanation of the motion of the perihelion of the planet
   Mercury, which has been known for a hundred years (since Leverrier),
   and for which theoretical astronomy has hitherto been unable
   satisfactorily to account.

   There is no difficulty in expressing Maxwell's theory of the
   electromagnetic field in terms of the general theory of relativity;
   this is done by application of the tensor formation (81), (82) and
   (77). Let be a tensor of the first rank, to be denoted as an
   electromagnetic 4-potential; then an electromagnetic field tensor may
   be defined by the relations, The second of Maxwell's systems of
   equations is then defined by the tensor equation, resulting from this,
   and the hrst of Maxwell's systems of equations is defined by the
   tensor-density relation [Pg 103] in which If we introduce the energy
   tensor of the electromagnetic field into the right-hand side of (96),
   we obtain (115), for the special case = 0, as a consequence of (96) by
   taking the divergence. This inclusion of the theory of electricity in
   the scheme of the general theory of relativity has been considered
   arbitrary and unsatisfactory by many theoreticians. Nor can we in this
   way conceive of the equilibrium of the electricity which constitutes
   the elementary electrically charged particles. A theory in which the
   gravitational field and the electromagnetic field enter as an essential
   entity would be much preferable. H. Weyl, and recently Th. Kaluza, have
   discovered some ingenious theorems along this direction; but concerning
   them, I am convinced that they do not bring us nearer to the true
   solution of the fundamental problem. I shall not go into this further,
   but shall give a brief discussion of the so-called cosmological
   problem, for without this, the considerations regarding the general
   theory of relativity would, in a certain sense, remain unsatisfactory.

   Our previous considerations, based upon the field equations (96), had
   for a foundation the conception that space on the whole is
   Galilean-Euclidean, and that this character is disturbed only by masses
   embedded in it. This conception was certainly justified as long as we
   were dealing with spaces of the order of magnitude of those that
   astronomy has to do with. But whether portions of the universe, however
   large they may be, are quasi-Euclidean, is a wholly different question.
   We can [Pg 104] make this clear by using an example from the theory of
   surfaces which we have employed many times. If a portion of a surface
   is observed by the eye to be practically plane, it does not at all
   follow that the whole surface has the form of a plane; the surface
   might just as well be a sphere, for example, of sufficiently large
   radius. The question as to whether the universe as a whole is
   non-Euclidean was much discussed from the geometrical point of view
   before the development of the theory of relativity. But with the theory
   of relativity, this problem has entered upon a new stage, for according
   to this theory the geometrical properties of bodies are not
   independent, but depend upon the distribution of masses.

   If the universe were quasi-Euclidean, then Mach was wholly wrong in his
   thought that inertia, as well as gravitation, depends upon a kind of
   mutual action between bodies. For in this case, with a suitably
   selected system of co-ordinates, the would be constant at infinity, as
   they are in the special theory of relativity, while within finite
   regions the would differ from these constant values by small amounts
   only, with a suitable choice of co-ordinates, as a result of the
   influence of the masses in finite regions. The physical properties of
   space would not then be wholly independent, that is, uninfluenced by
   matter, but in the main they would be, and only in small measure,
   conditioned by matter. Such a dualistic conception is even in itself
   not satisfactory; there are, however, some important physical arguments
   against it, which we shall consider.

   The hypothesis that the universe is infinite and Euclidean at infinity,
   is, from the relativistic point of view, a complicated hypothesis. In
   the language of the general theory of relativity it demands that the
   Riemann tensor of the fourth rank [Pg 105] shall vanish at infinity,
   which furnishes twenty independent conditions, while only ten curvature
   components , enter into the laws of the gravitational field. It is
   certainly unsatisfactory to postulate such a far-reaching limitation
   without any physical basis for it.

   But in the second place, the theory of relativity makes it appear
   probable that Mach was on the right road in his thought that inertia
   depends upon a mutual action of matter. For we shall show in the
   following that, according to our equations, inert masses do act upon
   each other in the sense of the relativity of inertia, even if only very
   feebly. What is to be expected along the line of Mach's thought?

   1. The inertia of a body must increase when ponderable masses are piled
   up in its neighbourhood.

   2. A body must experience an accelerating force when neighbouring
   masses are accelerated, and, in fact, the force must be in the same
   direction as the acceleration.

   3. A rotating hollow body must generate inside of itself a "Coriolis
   field," which deflects moving bodies in the sense of the rotation, and
   a radial centrifugal field as well.

   We shall now show that these three effects, which are to be expected in
   accordance with Mach's ideas, are actually present according to our
   theory, although their magnitude is so small that confirmation of them
   by laboratory experiments is not to be thought of. For this purpose we
   shall go back to the equations of motion of a material particle (90),
   and carry the approximations somewhat further than was done in equation
   (90a). [Pg 106]

   First, we consider as small of the first order. The square of the
   velocity of masses moving under the influence of the gravitational
   force is of the same order, according to the energy equation. It is
   therefore logical to regard the velocities of the material particles we
   are considering, as well as the velocities of the masses which generate
   the field, as small, of the order . We shall now carry out the
   approximation in the equations that arise from the field equations
   (101) and the equations of motion (90) so far as to consider terms, in
   the second member of (90), that are linear in those velocities.
   Further, we shall not put and equal to each other, but, corresponding
   to the higher approximation, we shall put From (90) we obtain, at
   first,

   From (101) we get, to the approximation sought for, in which, in (117),
   and denote the space indices only. [Pg 107]

   On the right-hand side of (116) we can replace 1 + by 1 and by . It is
   easy to see, in addition, that to this degree of approximation we must
   put in which , and denote space indices. We therefore obtain from
   (116), in the usual vector notation,

   The equations of motion, (118), show now, in fact, that

   1. The inert mass is proportional to 1 + and therefore increases when
   ponderable masses approach the test body.

   2. There is an inductive action of accelerated masses, of the same
   sign, upon the test body. This is the term . [Pg 108]

   3. A material particle, moving perpendicularly to the axis of rotation
   inside a rotating hollow body, is deflected in the sense of the
   rotation (Coriolis field). The centrifugal action, mentioned above,
   inside a rotating hollow body, also follows from the theory, as has
   been shown by Thirring.[41][18]

   [42][18]That the centrifugal action must be inseparably connected with
   the existence of the Coriolis field may be recognized, even without
   calculation, in the special case of a co-ordinate system rotating
   uniformly relatively to an inertial system; our general co-variant
   equations naturally must apply to such a case.

   Although all of these effects are inaccessible to experiment, because
   is so small, nevertheless they certainly exist according to the general
   theory of relativity. We must see in them a strong support for Mach's
   ideas as to the relativity of all inertial actions. If we think these
   ideas consistently through to the end we must expect the whole inertia,
   that is, the whole -field, to be determined by the matter of the
   universe, and not mainly by the boundary conditions at infinity.

   For a satisfactory conception of the -field of cosmical dimensions, the
   fact seems to be of significance that the relative velocity of the
   stars is small compared to the velocity of light. It follows from this
   that, with a suitable choice of co-ordinates, is nearly constant in the
   universe, at least, in that part of the universe in which there is
   matter. The assumption appears natural, moreover, that there are stars
   in all parts of the universe, so that we may well assume that the
   inconstancy of depends only upon the circumstance that matter is not
   distributed continuously, but is concentrated in single celestial
   bodies and systems of bodies. If we are willing to ignore these more
   local [Pg 109] non-uniformities of the density of matter and of the
   -field, in order to learn something of the geometrical properties of
   the universe as a whole, it appears natural to substitute for the
   actual distribution of masses a continuous distribution, and
   furthermore to assign to this distribution a uniform density . In this
   imagined universe all points with space directions will be
   geometrically equivalent; with respect to its space extension it will
   have a constant curvature, and will be cylindrical with respect to its
   -co-ordinate. The possibility seems to be particularly satisfying that
   the universe is spatially bounded and thus, in accordance with our
   assumption of the constancy of , is of constant curvature, being either
   spherical or elliptical; for then the boundary conditions at infinity
   which are so inconvenient from the standpoint of the general theory of
   relativity, may be replaced by the much more natural conditions for a
   closed surface.

   According to what has been said, we are to put in which the indices and
   run from 1 to 3 only. The will be such functions of , , as correspond
   to a three-dimensional continuum of constant positive curvature. We
   must now investigate whether such an assumption can satisfy the field
   equations of gravitation.

   In order to be able to investigate this, we must first find what
   differential conditions the three-dimensional manifold of constant
   curvature satisfies. A spherical manifold of three dimensions, [Pg 110]
   embedded in a Euclidean continuum of four dimensions,[43][19] is given
   by the equations By eliminating , we get

   [44][19]The aid of a fourth space dimension has naturally no
   significance except that of a mathematical artifice.

   As far as terms of the third and higher degrees in the , we can put, in
   the neighbourhood of the origin of co-ordinates,

   Inside the brackets are the of the manifold in the neighbourhood of the
   origin. Since the first derivatives of the , and therefore also the ,
   vanish at the origin, the calculation of the for this manifold, by
   (88), is very simple at the origin. We have

   Since the relation is universally co-variant, and since all points of
   the manifold are geometrically equivalent, this relation holds for
   every system of co-ordinates, and everywhere in the manifold. In order
   to avoid confusion with [Pg 111] the four-dimensional continuum, we
   shall, in the following, designate quantities that refer to the
   three-dimensional continuum by Greek letters, and put

   We now proceed to apply the field equations (96) to our special case.
   From (119) we get for the four-dimensional manifold,

   For the right-hand side of (96) we have to consider the energy tensor
   for matter distributed like a cloud of dust. According to what has gone
   before we must therefore put specialized for the case of rest. But in
   addition, we shall add a pressure term that may be physically
   established as follows. Matter consists of electrically charged
   particles. On the basis of Maxwell's theory these cannot be conceived
   of as electromagnetic fields free from singularities. In order to be
   consistent with the facts, it is necessary to introduce energy terms,
   not contained in Maxwell's theory, so that the single electric
   particles may hold together in spite of the mutual repulsions between
   their elements, charged with electricity of one sign. For the sake of
   consistency with this fact, Poincaré has assumed a pressure [Pg 112] to
   exist inside these particles which balances the electrostatic
   repulsion. It cannot, however, be asserted that this pressure vanishes
   outside the particles. We shall be consistent with this circumstance
   if, in our phenomenological presentation, we add a pressure term. This
   must not, however, be confused with a hydrodynamical pressure, as it
   serves only for the energetic presentation of the dynamical relations
   inside matter. In this sense we put

   In our special case we have, therefore, to put Observing that the field
   equation (96) may be written in the form we get from (96) the
   equations, From this follows

   If the universe is quasi-Euclidean, and its radius of curvature
   therefore infinite, then a would vanish. But it is improbable that [Pg
   113] the mean density of matter in the universe is actually zero; this
   is our third argument against the assumption that the universe is
   quasi-Euclidean. Nor does it seem possible that our hypothetical
   pressure can vanish; the physical nature of this pressure can be
   appreciated only after we have a better theoretical knowledge of the
   electromagnetic field. According to the second of equations (123) the
   radius, , of the universe is determined in terms of the total mass, ,
   of matter, by the equation The complete dependence of the geometrical
   upon the physical properties becomes clearly apparent by means of this
   equation.

   Thus we may present the following arguments against the conception of a
   space-infinite, and for the conception of a space-bounded, universe:—

   1. From the standpoint of the theory of relativity, the condition for a
   closed surface is very much simpler than the corresponding boundary
   condition at infinity of the quasi-Euclidean structure of the universe.

   2. The idea that Mach expressed, that inertia depends upon the mutual
   action of bodies, is contained, to a first approximation, in the
   equations of the theory of relativity; it follows from these equations
   that inertia depends, at least in part, upon mutual actions between
   masses. As it is an unsatisfactory assumption to make that inertia
   depends in part upon mutual actions, and in part upon an independent
   property of space, Mach's idea gains in probability. But this idea of
   Mach's corresponds only to a finite universe, bounded in space, and not
   to a quasi-Euclidean, infinite universe. From the standpoint of
   epistemology [Pg 114] it is more satisfying to have the mechanical
   properties of space completely determined by matter, and this is the
   case only in a space-bounded universe.

   3. An infinite universe is possible only if the mean density of matter
   in the universe vanishes. Although such an assumption is logically
   possible, it is less probable than the assumption that there is a
   finite mean density of matter in the universe. [Pg 115]

INDEX

   A

   Accelerated masses, inductive
   action of, [45]108
   Addition and subtraction of
   tensors, [46]14
   —theorem of velocities, [47]38

   B

   Biot-Savart force, [48]44

   C

   Centrifugal force, [49]64
   Clocks, moving, [50]38
   Compressible viscous fluid, [51]22
   Concept of space, [52]3
   —time, [53]28
   Conditions of orthogonality, [54]7
   Congruence, theorems of, [55]3
   Conservation principles, [56]54
   Continuum, four-dimensional, [57]31
   Contraction of tensors, [58]14
   Contra-variant vectors, [59]69
   —tensors, [60]71
   Co-ordinates, preferred systems
   of, [61]8
   Co-variance of equation of
   continuity, [62]21
   Co-variant, [63]12 et seq.
   —vector, [64]68
   Criticism of principle of inertia, [65]62
   Criticisms of theory of
   relativity, [66]29
   Curvilinear co-ordinates, [67]65

   D

   Differentiation of tensors, [68]73, [69]76
   Displacement of spectral lines, [70]97

   E

   Energy and mass, [71]45, [72]49
   —tensor of electromagnetic
   field, [73]50
   —of matter, [74]54
   Equation of continuity, co-variance
   of, [75]21
   Equations of motion of material
   particle, [76]50
   Equivalence of mass and
   energy, [77]49
   Equivalent spaces of reference, [78]25
   Euclidean geometry, [79]4

   F

   Finiteness of universe, [80]105
   Fizeau, [81]28
   Four-dimensional continuum, [82]31
   Four-vector, [83]41
   Fundamental tensor, [84]71

   G

   Galilean regions, [85]62
   —transformation, [86]27
   Gauss, [87]65
   Geodetic lines, [88]82
   Geometry, Euclidean, [89]4
   Gravitation constant, [90]95
   Gravitational mass, [91]60

   H

   Homogeneity of space, [92]17
   Hydrodynamical equations, [93]54
   Hypotheses of pre-relativity
   physics, [94]73

   I

   Inductive action of accelerated
   masses, [95]108
   Inert and gravitational mass, equality
   of, [96]60
   Invariant, [97]9 et seq.
   Isotropy of space, [98]17

   K

   Kaluza, [99]104

   L

   Levi-Civita, [100]73
   Light-cone, [101]41
   Light ray, path of, [102]98
   Light-time, [103]33
   Linear orthogonal
   transformation, [104]7
   Lorentz electromotive force, [105]44
   —transformation, [106]31

   M

   Mach, [107]59, [108]105, [109]106, [110]109, [111]114
   Mass and Energy, [112]45, [113]49
   —equality of gravitational and
   inert, [114]60
   —gravitational, [115]60
   Maxwell's equations, [116]23
   Mercury, perihelion of, [117]99, [118]103
   Michelson and Morley, [119]28
   Minkowski, [120]32
   Motion of particle, equations of, [121]50
   Moving measuring rods and
   clocks, [122]38
   Multiplication of tensors, [123]14

   N

   Newtonian gravitation
   constant, [124]95

   O

   Operations on tensors, [125]13 et seq.
   Orthogonal transformations, linear, [126]7
   Orthogonality, conditions of, [127]7

   P

   Path of light ray, [128]98
   Perihelion of Mercury, [129]99, [130]103
   Poisson's equation, [131]87
   Preferred systems of
   co-ordinates, [132]8
   Pre-relativity physics, hypotheses
   of, [133]26
   Principle of equivalence, [134]61
   —inertia, criticism of, [135]62
   Principles of conservation, [136]54

   R

   Radius of Universe, [137]113
   Rank of tensor, [138]13
   Ray of light, path of, [139]98
   Reference, space of, [140]3
   Riemann, [141]68
   —tensor, [142]79, [143]82, [144]105
   Rods (measuring) and clocks in
   motion, [145]38
   Rotation, [146]63

   S

   Simultaneity, [147]17, [148]29
   Sitter, [149]28
   Skew-symmetrical tensor, [150]15
   Solar Eclipse expedition (1919), [151]99
   Space, concept of, [152]2
   —Homogeneity of, [153]17
   —Isotropy of, [154]17
   Spaces of reference, [155]3
   —equivalence of, [156]25
   Special Lorentz transformation, [157]34
   Spectral lines, displacement of, [158]97
   Straightest lines, [159]82
   Stress tensor, [160]22
   Symmetrical tensor, [161]15
   Systems of co-ordinates,
   preferred, [162]8

   T

   Tensor, [163]12 et seq., [164]68 et seq.
   —Addition and subtraction of, [165]14
   —Contraction of, [166]14
   —Fundamental, [167]71
   —Multiplication of, [168]14
   —operations, [169]13 et seq.
   —Rank of, [170]13
   —Symmetrical and
   Skew-symmetrical, [171]15
   Tensors, formation by
   differentiation, [172]73
   Theorem for addition of
   velocities, [173]38
   Theorems of congruence, [174]3
   Theory of relativity, criticisms
   of, [175]29
   Thirring, [176]109
   Time-concept, [177]28
   Time-space concept, [178]31
   Transformation, Galilean, [179]27
   —Linear orthogonal, [180]7

   U

   Universe, Finiteness of, [181]105
   —Radius of, [182]113

   V

   Vector, co-variant, [183]69
   —contra-variant, [184]69
   Velocities, addition theorem of, [185]38
   Viscous compressible fluid, [186]22

   W

   Weyl, [187]73, [188]99, [189]104

   PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN AT THE UNIVERSITY PRESS, ABERDEEN

   TRANSCRIBER'S NOTES

   This ebook was produced using OCR text provided by Northeastern
   University's Snell Library through the Internet Archive.

   Minor typographical corrections and presentational changes have been
   made without comment.

   *** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE MEANING OF RELATIVITY ***

   Updated editions will replace the previous one—the old editions will be
   renamed.

   Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
   law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works, so
   the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United
   States without permission and without paying copyright royalties.
   Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this
   license, apply to copying and distributing Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG™ concept and
   trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be
   used if you charge for an eBook, except by following the terms of the
   trademark license, including paying royalties for use of the Project
   Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for copies of this
   eBook, complying with the trademark license is very easy. You may use
   this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works,
   reports, performances and research. Project Gutenberg eBooks may be
   modified and printed and given away—you may do practically ANYTHING in
   the United States with eBooks not protected by U.S. copyright law.
   Redistribution is subject to the trademark license, especially
   commercial redistribution.

   START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE

   PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

   To protect the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting the free
   distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
   (or any other work associated in any way with the phrase “Project
   Gutenberg”), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
   Gutenberg™ License available with this file or online at
   www.gutenberg.org/license.

   Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works

   1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg™ electronic
   work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to and accept
   all the terms of this license and intellectual property
   (trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
   the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
   all copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in your possession.
   If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
   Gutenberg™ electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
   terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
   entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

   1.B. “Project Gutenberg” is a registered trademark. It may only be used
   on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who agree
   to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few things that
   you can do with most Project Gutenberg™ electronic works even without
   complying with the full terms of this agreement. See paragraph 1.C
   below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement and help
   preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. See
   paragraph 1.E below.

   1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation (“the
   Foundation” or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
   of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. Nearly all the individual works
   in the collection are in the public domain in the United States. If an
   individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the United States
   and you are located in the United States, we do not claim a right to
   prevent you from copying, distributing, performing, displaying or
   creating derivative works based on the work as long as all references
   to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope that you will
   support the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting free access to
   electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg™ works in
   compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the Project
   Gutenberg™ name associated with the work. You can easily comply with
   the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the same format
   with its attached full Project Gutenberg™ License when you share it
   without charge with others.

   1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
   what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are in
   a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States, check
   the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
   before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
   creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
   Gutenberg™ work. The Foundation makes no representations concerning the
   copyright status of any work in any country other than the United
   States.

   1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

   1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
   access to, the full Project Gutenberg™ License must appear prominently
   whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg™ work (any work on which the
   phrase “Project Gutenberg” appears, or with which the phrase “Project
   Gutenberg” is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
   copied or distributed:

   This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
   most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
   restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
   under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
   eBook or online at [190]www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in
   the United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
   you are located before using this eBook.

   1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is derived
   from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not contain a
   notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the copyright
   holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in the United
   States without paying any fees or charges. If you are redistributing or
   providing access to a work with the phrase “Project Gutenberg”
   associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply either with
   the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or obtain permission
   for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg™ trademark as set
   forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

   1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is posted
   with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
   must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
   terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms will be linked
   to the Project Gutenberg™ License for all works posted with the
   permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

   1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg™
   License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
   work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg™.

   1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
   electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
   prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
   active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
   Gutenberg™ License.

   1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
   compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
   any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
   to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg™ work in a format other
   than “Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other format used in the official version
   posted on the official Project Gutenberg™ website (www.gutenberg.org),
   you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
   copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
   request, of the work in its original “Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other
   form. Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg™
   License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

   1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
   performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg™ works unless
   you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

   1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
   access to or distributing Project Gutenberg™ electronic works provided
   that:

     * • You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
       the use of Project Gutenberg™ works calculated using the method you
       already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed to
       the owner of the Project Gutenberg™ trademark, but he has agreed to
       donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project Gutenberg
       Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid within
       60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are legally
       required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty payments
       should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project Gutenberg
       Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in Section 4,
       “Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
       Archive Foundation.”
     * • You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who
       notifies you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt
       that s/he does not agree to the terms of the full Project
       Gutenberg™ License. You must require such a user to return or
       destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and
       discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of Project
       Gutenberg™ works.
     * • You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
       any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
       electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
       receipt of the work.
     * • You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
       distribution of Project Gutenberg™ works.

   1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg™
   electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set forth
   in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from the
   Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of the
   Project Gutenberg™ trademark. Contact the Foundation as set forth in
   Section 3 below.

   1.F.

   1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
   effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
   works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
   Gutenberg™ collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
   contain “Defects,” such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
   or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
   intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
   other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot
   be read by your equipment.

   1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the “Right
   of Replacement or Refund” described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
   Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
   Gutenberg™ trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
   Gutenberg™ electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all liability
   to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal fees. YOU AGREE
   THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, BREACH OF
   WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH
   1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY
   DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL,
   DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF
   YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.

   1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
   defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
   receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
   written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
   received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
   your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you with
   the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
   refund. If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
   providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
   receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If the second copy
   is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
   opportunities to fix the problem.

   1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
   in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you ‘AS-IS’, WITH NO OTHER
   WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED
   TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

   1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
   warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
   If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates
   the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall
   be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted
   by the applicable state law. The invalidity or unenforceability of any
   provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

   1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
   trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
   providing copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in accordance
   with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
   promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works,
   harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
   that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you
   do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project
   Gutenberg™ work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or
   deletions to any Project Gutenberg™ work, and (c) any Defect you cause.

   Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg™

   Project Gutenberg™ is synonymous with the free distribution of
   electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
   including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It exists
   because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
   people in all walks of life.

   Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
   assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg™’s
   goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg™ collection will remain
   freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
   Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
   and permanent future for Project Gutenberg™ and future generations. To
   learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and
   how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4 and the
   Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org.

   Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation

   The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
   501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the state
   of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal Revenue
   Service. The Foundation’s EIN or federal tax identification number is
   64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by U.S.
   federal laws and your state’s laws.

   The Foundation’s business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
   Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up to
   date contact information can be found at the Foundation’s website and
   official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

   Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
   Literary Archive Foundation

   Project Gutenberg™ depends upon and cannot survive without widespread
   public support and donations to carry out its mission of increasing the
   number of public domain and licensed works that can be freely
   distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest array of
   equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations ($1 to
   $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt status
   with the IRS.

   The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
   charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
   States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
   considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
   with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations where
   we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
   DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
   state visit [191]www.gutenberg.org/donate.

   While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
   have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
   against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
   approach us with offers to donate.

   International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make any
   statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from outside
   the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

   Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
   methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other ways
   including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To donate,
   please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

   Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg™ electronic
   works

   Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project Gutenberg™
   concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
   with anyone. For forty years, he produced and distributed Project
   Gutenberg™ eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

   Project Gutenberg™ eBooks are often created from several printed
   editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
   the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
   necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
   edition.

   Most people start at our website which has the main PG search facility:
   [192]www.gutenberg.org.

   This website includes information about Project Gutenberg™, including
   how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to subscribe to
   our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

References

   1. https://www.gutenberg.org/
   2. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#chap01
   3. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#chap02
   4. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#chap03
   5. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#chap04
   6. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#INDEX
   7. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_1_1
   8. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_1_1
   9. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_2_1
  10. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_2_1
  11. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_3_1
  12. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_3_1
  13. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_4_1
  14. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_4_1
  15. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_5_1
  16. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_5_1
  17. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_6_1
  18. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_6_1
  19. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_7_1
  20. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_7_1
  21. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_8_1
  22. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_8_1
  23. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_9_1
  24. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_9_1
  25. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_10_1
  26. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_10_1
  27. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_11_1
  28. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_11_1
  29. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_12_1
  30. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_12_1
  31. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_13_1
  32. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_13_1
  33. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_14_1
  34. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_14_1
  35. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_15_1
  36. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_15_1
  37. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_16_1
  38. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_16_1
  39. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_17_1
  40. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_17_1
  41. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_18_1
  42. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_18_1
  43. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Footnote_19_1
  44. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#FNanchor_19_1
  45. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_108
  46. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
  47. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
  48. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_44
  49. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_64
  50. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
  51. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_22
  52. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_3
  53. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_28
  54. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_7
  55. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_3
  56. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_54
  57. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_31
  58. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
  59. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_69
  60. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_71
  61. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_8
  62. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_21
  63. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_12
  64. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_68
  65. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_62
  66. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_29
  67. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_65
  68. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_73
  69. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_76
  70. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_97
  71. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_45
  72. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_49
  73. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_50
  74. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_54
  75. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_21
  76. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_50
  77. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_49
  78. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_25
  79. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_4
  80. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_105
  81. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_28
  82. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_31
  83. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_41
  84. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_71
  85. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_62
  86. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_27
  87. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_65
  88. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_82
  89. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_4
  90. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_95
  91. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_60
  92. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_17
  93. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_54
  94. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_73
  95. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_108
  96. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_60
  97. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_9
  98. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_17
  99. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_104
 100. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_73
 101. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_41
 102. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_98
 103. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_33
 104. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_7
 105. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_44
 106. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_31
 107. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_59
 108. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_105
 109. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_106
 110. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_109
 111. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_114
 112. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_45
 113. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_49
 114. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_60
 115. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_60
 116. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_23
 117. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_99
 118. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_103
 119. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_28
 120. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_32
 121. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_50
 122. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
 123. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
 124. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_95
 125. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_13
 126. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_7
 127. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_7
 128. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_98
 129. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_99
 130. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_103
 131. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_87
 132. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_8
 133. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_26
 134. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_61
 135. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_62
 136. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_54
 137. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_113
 138. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_13
 139. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_98
 140. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_3
 141. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_68
 142. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_79
 143. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_82
 144. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_105
 145. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
 146. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_63
 147. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_17
 148. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_29
 149. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_28
 150. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_15
 151. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_99
 152. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_2
 153. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_17
 154. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_17
 155. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_3
 156. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_25
 157. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_34
 158. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_97
 159. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_82
 160. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_22
 161. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_15
 162. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_8
 163. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_12
 164. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_68
 165. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
 166. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
 167. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_71
 168. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_14
 169. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_13
 170. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_13
 171. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_15
 172. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_73
 173. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
 174. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_3
 175. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_29
 176. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_109
 177. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_28
 178. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_31
 179. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_27
 180. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_7
 181. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_105
 182. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_113
 183. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_69
 184. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_69
 185. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_38
 186. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_22
 187. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_69
 188. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_99
 189. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/36276/pg36276-images.html#Page_104
 190. https://www.gutenberg.org/
 191. https://www.gutenberg.org/donate/
 192. https://www.gutenberg.org/
